http://ktar.com/story/94909/study-arizona-most-corrupt-state-in-us/
	PHOENIX — Arizona is the most corruption-ridden state in the nation, a Harvard study said.

	According to the Harvard study said Arizona had the highest instance of illegal corruption — “private gains in the form of cash or gifts by a government official, in exchange for providing specific benefits to private individuals or groups” — when surveying nearly 1,000 reporters.

	To determine the most corrupt states, the authors had reporters rank the instances they see illegal corruption in the different branches of government on a one (least) to five (most) scale. Arizona did not fare well in any ranking, especially the executive and legislative branches, where reporters said they see “very high” instances of corruption.


------

https://townhall.com/columnists/rachelalexander/2016/03/07/arizona-legislature-finally-about-to-dismantle-corrupt-arizona-bar-n2129834

shady person Rachel Alexander disbarred, becomes journalist, politicizes Arizona corruption


http://tucson.com/news/local/border/border-corruption-cases-grow/article_836254a0-34aa-5298-985e-9d421c4d3587.html
	The Mexican government's 4-year-old crackdown on drug gangs - an effort aided by the U.S. - is likely more responsible for the increase in corruption than any errors made by the agency during the hiring boom, said Susan Ginsburg, member of the 9/11 Commission and nonresident fellow at the Washington, D.C.-based Migration Policy Institute, a centrist think tank.

	"They've responded by becoming more aggressive in their efforts with border officials," Ginsburg said.


what


------


http://www.azcentral.com/story/opinion/letters/2016/05/05/arizona-corporation-commission-investigation/83983846/
	Letter: Why Arizona is the most corrupt state


	Robert Robb stated ("More Democrats run to the feds") that Arizona Corporation Commission candidates Bill Mundell and Tom Chabin were wrong in turning to the federal government and asking U.S. Attorney for Arizona John Leonardo to investigate the commission for potential corruption.

	Would Mr. Robb suggest they turn to Gov. Ducey who replaced one conflicted commissioner with another? Or should they have turned to the Legislature, which recently passed bills to expand the use of dark money and is led by a Speaker of the House who illegally used public dollars for campaign purposes?

	Let’s not forget that Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio, Pinal County Sheriff Paul Babeu, and the Maricopa County Recorder’s Office are under federal investigation on a variety of issues. There’s a reason Arizona has been called the most corrupt state in the nation.

	There may be some who are comfortable with this corruption, but there are millions of Arizonans like myself who are not! Mr. Mundell and Mr. Chabin should be commended for fighting for us and not the utilities that appear to have the majority of the Corp. Comm.


(related to letter? http://www.azcentral.com/story/opinion/editorial/2017/05/30/gary-pierce-corporation-commission-indictment/353917001/ not sure if related to Arpaio though)

------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joe_Arpaio
	Arpaio has been accused of various types of misconduct, including abuse of power; misuse of funds; failure to investigate sex crimes; improper clearance of cases; unlawful enforcement of immigration laws; and election law violations. A Federal court monitor was appointed to oversee his office's operations because of complaints of racial profiling. The U.S. Department of Justice concluded that Arpaio oversaw the worst pattern of racial profiling in U.S. history, and subsequently filed suit against him for unlawful discriminatory police conduct.[14]


------

http://www.nytimes.com/2013/05/25/us/federal-judge-finds-violations-of-rights-by-sheriff-joe-arpaio.html
	At 142 pages, the decision is peppered with stinging criticism of the policies and practices espoused by Sheriff Arpaio, who Judge Snow said had turned much of his focus to arresting immigrants who were in the country illegally, in most cases civil violations, at the expense of fighting crimes.


Arpaio not doing his job

	He said the sheriff relied on racial profiling and illegal detentions to target Latinos, using their ethnicity as the main basis for suspecting they were in the country illegally. Many of the people targeted were American citizens or legal residents.

	...The ruling is a result of a federal civil trial last summer in which Sheriff Arpaio and his office were accused in a class-action lawsuit of singling out Latinos for stops, questioning and detention. It says deputies considered the prevalence of Latinos when deciding where to carry out enforcement operations, in many cases in response to complaints based solely on assumptions that Latinos or “Mexicans,” as some complainants put it, were necessarily illegal immigrants.


harassing U.S. citizens


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Demographics_of_Arizona
	In addition, Hispanics and Latinos made up 29.0% of Arizona's population

29% Hispanic out of 6.343  million, so 1.83947 million Hispanics


http://www.phoenixnewtimes.com/news/arizonas-undocumented-immigrant-population-inches-up-while-nations-holds-steady-8668831


says 325,000 undocumented immigrations as of 2014

so stopping a random Hispanic person on the street, a 17.7% chance that person is an undocumented immigrant. Arpaio is harassing U.S. citizens 82.3% of the time.


------


http://www.azfamily.com/story/17159125/criminal-pasts-dont-disqualify-members-of-arpaio-posse
	Maricopa County Sheriff's Posse members wear uniforms, have badges, drive county vehicles and some even carry guns. And some of them also have criminal records.       

	"They have as much power as the deputy wants to give them, including the power to arrest under the supervision of that deputy," said Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio.

	Arpaio wants his army of 3,000 volunteer posse members to look like sworn deputies and sometimes perform the same duties. But an in-depth project by CBS 5 Investigates uncovered a number of posse members with arrests for assault, drug possession, domestic violence, sex crimes against children, disorderly conduct, impersonating an officer - and the list goes on.           

	These are crimes that are not tolerated in many professions, especially professions with an implied authority.

	"We have about 600 (members) armed with guns," said Arpaio. "We haven't seen any problems with posse men and women shooting people and everything else. Where are all the problems?"


Arpaio has army of crooks with guns

	...A posse applicant "could be disqualified" if they have a felony conviction, have used illegal drugs excessively, or sport a misdemeanor narcotics conviction, according to the sheriff's office posse application. Despite Hoopingarner's disclosure, he was hired on the posse.           

	And then there was Jacob Cutler. According to a Flagstaff police report, Cutler threw his girlfriend to the ground and choked her while trying to sexually assault her in 2008. When she didn't cooperate, he allegedly threatened to call police and said they would side with him, because he "has a badge." He was a member of Arpaio's posse at the time.

	Cutler and Hoopingarner attended anger management and drug diversion programs, respectively, and their records were eventually wiped clean. Cutler maintained his posse membership and Hoopingarner was later approved as a member.


less than extreme vetting


	While combing through thousands of pages of court records and police reports, CBS 5 Investigates discovered that some posse members were behaving as though they were above the law.

	Kevin Ray Campos was arrested in 2007 outside a Scottsdale club for disorderly conduct. According to the police report, he spit on several bouncers and then hurled profanities at a Scottsdale police officer. He pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor, according to court records, and was hired as a posse member a year later.

	..."If the posse members are being given badges, if the posse members are being given guns, then they ought to have the same supervision as other law enforcement agencies have," said Charlton. "Here, that's not taking place and that's reason for concern."

	One posse member with an extensive disciplinary file is Douglas Clark, who also happens to be a constable. Clark has been counseled for rolling a county vehicle, driving 91 mph in a 45-mph zone, using his siren when not on a call, and using red-and-blue lights installed on his personal vehicle to look for something his wife had lost in the road.

	CBS 5 Investigates tracked Clark down and asked him if he feels he is above the law.

	"I can't answer anything on posse stuff," Clark told us. "I'm forbidden to answer anything with the sheriff's office."

	And then there's the accusation from 2007 that a driver backed into Clark's car and then left the scene. Clark allegedly followed the car, rammed the vehicle and held the driver and passenger at gunpoint, all while he was off-duty.

	Yet, Clark still remains in the posse.


hmmm


	...Posse members provide their own uniforms, handcuffs and guns, which can cost as much as $2,300.

	"I don't know what we would do without the posse because we have a shortage of manpower and they pick up the slack free of charge, no cost to the taxpayers," said Arpaio.

	While they don't draw a salary, posse members operate within taxpayer protection and under the county's insurance.

	"There is no one in this country that has thousands of posse men and women doing the job on volunteerism," said Arpaio. "I have confidence in them. I have faith in them and I am going to continue to run the posse and hire more posse."


what an innovation


------

http://www.wnd.com/2013/01/sheriff-joe-arpaio-im-not-confiscating-guns/
	“I took [multiple] oaths of office, and they all say I will defend the Constitution of the United States,” Arpaio told Mike Broomhead of KFYI Radio in Phoenix, Ariz. “Now if they’re going to tell the sheriff that he’s going to go around picking up guns from everybody, they’re going to have a problem. I may not enforce that federal law.”


Apraio promises to uphold the constitution


------


http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/02/06/sheriff-joe-arpaio-steven-seagal_n_2631101.html
	Sheriff Joe Arpaio has a special weapon against school shootings: action movie star Steven Seagal.

	The Associated Press reports that the Maricopa County Sheriff will host a training session for volunteers to help them learn how to handle school shootings.

	The training will take place this Saturday in Fountain Hills, Ariz. and Seagal will be one of the instructors leading the drills, according to the AP.

	The Arizona Republic’s EJ Montini is skeptical of Arpaio’s motives and also notes that, since the sheriff’s posse of volunteers are now on the job guarding schools, shouldn’t they have already gotten training?

	“It’s about publicity, as it always is when Arpaio is involved,” Montini writes.

	The Phoenix New Times hopes Seagal will break out some of the moves he implemented in 1997’s “Fire Down Below.”


Buddies with Steven Seagal, who's also buddies with Kim Jong Un


------


https://www.csmonitor.com/USA/Politics/2013/0531/Sheriff-Joe-Arpaio-dodges-a-recall-in-Arizona.-Still-is-his-star-waning
	Pinal County's Paul Babeu and Cochise County's Larry Dever, sheriffs who rode Arizona's anti-illegal immigration fervor into iconic status, are out of the picture. Sheriff Dever died in a rollover accident in late 2012. His blood alcohol level was more than three times the state's legal limit of 0.08. Sheriff Babeu retreated after his ex-lover, a Mexican immigrant, outed him as gay.


wat


	..."His days are counted," Alvarez insists.

	Berman is not convinced. Arpaio and his defiance of the Obama administration represent those who hold deep-seated feelings against the federal government – and that sentiment is unlikely to dissipate quickly, he says.

	"He's the real symbol of that opposition," Berman adds.

	It's no surprise to Bruce Merrill, a political scientist who has directed various Arizona polls on immigration, that Arpaio endures even as other immigration hard-liners vanish.

	"He's been the dominant one for a long time," says Mr. Merrill, citing Arpaio's media savvy as one factor.


Arpaio using media, politics to keep himself in power, maybe less about the job he was doing

a lot like Trump


------


http://www.rollingstone.com/culture/news/the-long-lawless-ride-of-sheriff-joe-arpaio-20120802
	Hey! You! Get off of my cloud!

	Joe Arpaio, the 80-year-old lawman who brands himself "America's toughest sheriff," is smiling like a delighted gnome. Nineteen floors above the blazing Arizona desert, the Phoenix sprawl ripples in the heat as Arpaio cues up the Rolling Stones to welcome a reporter "from that marijuana magazine."

	Hey! You! Get off of my cloud!

	The guided tour of Arpaio's legend has officially begun. Here, next to his desk, is the hand-painted sign of draconian rules for Tent City, the infamous jail he set up 20 years ago, in which some 2,000 inmates live under canvas tarps in the desert, forced to wear pink underwear beneath their black-and-white-striped uniforms while cracking rocks in the stifling heat. HARD LABOR, the sign reads. NO GIRLIE MAGAZINES!


Arpaio seems to be cultivating an image (and media oblige?)

	From behind his desk, Arpaio pulls out a stack of news clips about himself, dozens of them, featuring the gruff, no-frills enforcer of Maricopa County, whose officers regularly round up illegal immigrants in late-night raids, his 60th made only a few days ago, at a local furniture store. "Everything I did, all over the world," he crows, flipping through the stories. "You can see this week: national magazine of Russia... BBC... Some people call me a publicity hound."


This mean anything? he popular at all in Russia?


	...Arpaio is an unabashed carnival barker. And his antics might be amusing if he weren't also notorious for being not just the toughest but the most corrupt and abusive sheriff in America. As Arizona has become center stage for the debate over illegal immigration and the civil rights of Latinos, Arpaio has sold himself as the symbol of nativist defiance, a modern-day Bull Connor bucking the federal government over immigration policy. As such, he's become the go-to media prop for conservative politicians, from state legislators to presidential candidates, who want to be seen as immigration hard-liners. "I had Michele Bachmann sitting right there," says Arpaio, pointing to my chair. "All these presidential guys coming to see me!"


right, external image, internal corruption

	...His rhetoric and tactics have spread fear in the Latino community in Arizona. "They hate me, the Hispanic community, because they're afraid they're going to be arrested," Arpaio boasted to a TV interviewer in 2009. "And they're all leaving town, so I think we're doing something good, if they're leaving." But the all-consuming focus on immigration has come at a cost: Arpaio is so obsessed with the often illusory crimes of immigrants that he ignored more than 400 cases of sexual abuse he was responsible for investigating, including assaults on children. And it surprised no one that JT Ready, the Arizona white supremacist who shot and killed his girlfriend, her family and himself last May, had attended Arpaio rallies.


Arpaio not doing his job


	...His rhetoric and tactics have spread fear in the Latino community in Arizona. "They hate me, the Hispanic community, because they're afraid they're going to be arrested," Arpaio boasted to a TV interviewer in 2009. "And they're all leaving town, so I think we're doing something good, if they're leaving."

	..."Want to see the tent where all the Mexicans are?" Arpaio asks in a conspiratorial whisper. "Huh?"


Arpaio racist?


	...From the start, the jail was notorious for its minimalist living conditions, which Arpaio says have saved Maricopa County millions of dollars in building and operational costs. Arpaio fed prisoners two meals a day (valued at 30 cents each), banned cigarettes and coffee, and boasted that temperatures in the summer can hit 141 degrees. His constituents lapped it up, and the national press came calling. Arpaio brought back chain gangs and paraded prisoners through the streets to be jeered at. In 1996, he published his first book, America's Toughest Sheriff, which was praised by Sen. John McCain as "no-nonsense."


but there is a lot of nonsense going on with Apraio

seems to be proud of abuse, even though majority are awaiting trial

http://nymag.com/news/features/hillary-clinton-2013-9/

Joe Hagan sketchy


------


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation/2014/03/07/records-fbi-urged-charges-in-ariz-abuse-of-power-case/6152807/
	FBI urged charges in probe of 'Sheriff Joe,' others

	Federal prosecutors later closed the criminal investigation against Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio and other county officials.

	PHOENIX -- Federal investigators concluded there was sufficient evidence to bring charges against public officials during their years-long abuse-of-power investigation targeting Maricopa County law-enforcement agencies, according to heavily redacted records obtained by The Arizona Republic.

	The records indicate that FBI agents found probable cause to recommend felony counts of obstructing criminal investigations of prosecutions, theft by threats, tampering with witnesses, perjury and theft by extortion.

	Ultimately, federal prosecutors in August 2012 closed the three-year FBI criminal investigation and grand-jury probe into Sheriff Joe Arpaio, former County Attorney Andrew Thomas and their top deputies, saying there would be no indictments due to a lack of evidence or an insurmountable burden of proof.


what happened here?

	...Nevertheless, the abuse-of-authority probe at least partially targeted the Maricopa Anti-Corruption Effort, a unit of sheriff's deputies and county prosecutors who in 2006 were assigned by Arpaio and Thomas to investigate government officials suspected of violating the public trust. That unit was eventually disbanded.

	The report makes clear that FBI agents believed evidence was strong enough to prosecute some of those under investigation.

	Arpaio could not be reached for comment, but he has said in the past that the federal probe was politically motivated.


"politically motivated"

why didn't they press charges?


	...The FBI's abuse-of-power investigation was launched in 2008 at the outset of a vitriolic political war pitting Arpaio and Thomas against the Maricopa County Board of Supervisors and the county judiciary.

	County officials swept their offices, suspecting illegal wiretaps. Some said they were followed by sheriff's deputies. Others refused to talk on their phones, fearing they were bugged. After county law enforcement's first case against Stapley fell apart, he was arrested without a warrant based on allegations he committed mortgage and campaign fraud. The case eventually was tossed.

	Supervisor Mary Rose Wilcox was indicted on charges alleging conflict of interest, while Superior Court Judge Gary Donahoe was accused of bribery. Thomas and Arpaio filed a federal racketeering charge against them and other county officials. All those cases were dismissed by March 2010.

	Even as the federal investigation was underway, Arpaio, Thomas and their representatives defended their actions, saying they were fighting government corruption.


This is like some Soviet Union shit


	Eventually, Arpaio's top aide was fired. Thomas resigned to pursue an unsuccessful bid for attorney general and was later disbarred from practicing law. The sheriff backed off his corruption crusade and focused on repairing relations with the Board of Supervisors.

	As of January, the conflicts and legal battles had cost taxpayers at least $44.4 million.


Arpaio not doing his job


	...In the newly released FBI referrals, agents said there was evidence to prosecute at least two Maricopa County officials for conspiracy and obstruction. In other segments of the report, agents recommended criminal charges against several unnamed officials for theft by extortion, improperly influencing a public official, perjury and conspiracy.

	Paul Charlton, who once served as a U.S. attorney for Arizona, reviewed the documents Thursday but said "it's impossible to know anything of substance" because of the redactions.

	Charlton, who defended Stapley, said it can be difficult to reconcile investigators' conclusions with prosecutors' decisions.

	"You necessarily rely on the agents for their sense of what happened and for their findings and facts," Charlton said. "It's the agent's role to say, 'I think I've identified a crime.' It's the prosecutor's role to say whether that crime can be proven."


prosecutor let him off?

	Aubuchon, who was disbarred for her part in pressing the corruption cases, said the Justice Department appropriately declined to charge her with any crimes. "I did nothing wrong," she added, "and I'm still working to expose the corruption that continues to exist in Maricopa County."

	Jack MacIntyre, deputy chief at the Sheriff's Office, said he had not seen the FBI report until Thursday. "It's real hard to comment on something we were never given the courtesy of receiving even though we requested it," he added.

	Stapley, who was indicted and arrested during those probes, sued the county and settled in December 2013 for $3.5 million. "The settlement vindicated me to some degree," Stapley said Thursday. "But it would've been much better had they (federal authorities) done their job."


DOJ let them off? Lynch?


------

http://www.azcentral.com/story/laurieroberts/2015/04/24/joe-arpaio-contempt-hearing/26316123/
	America's scariest sheriff admitted that he'd hired an investigator to investigate the Department of Justice, which at the time was investigating him and his top deputies for abuse of power. And he admitted that his attorney hired an investigator to investigate the wife of the federal judge who nailed the Maricopa County Sheriff's Office for engaging in widespread racial profiling of Latino drivers.

	The judge who is now considering whether to refer Arpaio to prosecutors for criminal contempt charges.

	Generally speaking, it's not nice to try to intimidate federal authorities. But then again, intimidation has been the name of Arpaio's sleazy game for years.

	Just ask Dan Saban, who ran against Arpaio in 2004 and found himself the subject of a rape investigation. Arpaio opened a criminal investigation in a 30-year-old allegation that Saban, then 17, had raped his adoptive mother. Saban claimed he was the victim. Regardless, the statute of limitations had run out but not the statute of intimidation. Saban lost the election. He sued for defamation and lost but it cost us well over $800,000 to defend Arpaio.


Arpaio abuse of power, intimidating opponents, wasting money

	Just ask former Maricopa County Schools Superintendent Sandra Dowling, whose home was invaded in 2006 by the sheriff's SWAT team, in search of evidence that she'd been stealing, basically, from homeless children. She was later convicted of a misdemeanor, for giving her daughter a summer job. That one cost us $250,000.

	Just ask Phoenix New Times founders Michael Lacey and Jim Larkin, arrested in 2007 in the dead of night after writing a piece critical of Arpaio's sidekick, then-Maricopa County Attorney Andrew Thomas. That one cost us $3.75 million.

	Just ask former Maricopa County Supervisors Mary Rose Wilcox, former Supervisor Don Stapley, former Superior Court Judges Gary Donahoe, Ken Fields, Barbara Mundell and Anna Baca, and a collection of county employees. Arpaio and Thomas in 2008 and 2009 launched a series of corruption investigations, indicting Wilcox, Stapley and Donahoe and accusing the others of racketeering. All charges/accusations were dismissed in 2010. Cost to taxpayers; $7.5 million.


wasting a lot of money

most of these motivated by retaliation, intimidation?

	...The court order slipped through the cracks? For 18 months?

	Arpaio is either lying or he's admitting that at at 82, he's no longer able to do the job.

	Either way, he should resign.

	Arpaio's day is done. His America's-toughest-sheriff, I'm-the-only-one-enforcing-immigration-laws schtick long ago went sour and the people of Arizona – the ones outside the Joe Choir – now have seen at exactly who and what Arpaio is.

	A bully with a badge.


sounds like me might have been unpopular

------

http://www.phoenixnewtimes.com/news/sheriff-joe-arpaios-enemies-are-closer-than-ever-to-taking-him-down-7575718
	In January 1999, Maricopa County settled with the family of Scott Norberg, who was brutally beaten, tased, strapped into a restraint chair, and suffocated by Arpaio's detention officers in the now-shuttered Madison Street Jail.

	The price tag: $8.25 million.

	According to Maricopa County, payouts and settlements on MCSO-related lawsuits since 1993, the year Arpaio took office, have cost nearly $75 million.

	But in 1999, $8.25 million was an unprecedented amount of damage for a jail death.


more wasting money


	Then-County Attorney Rick Romley and the U.S. Attorney's Office looked into possible criminal charges related to the death and an MCSO cover-up involving the destruction of evidence, including Norberg's crushed larynx.

	News stories reported allegations that Arpaio had Romley, Norberg family attorney Mike Manning, Norberg's dad, and the jurist in the case, U.S. District Judge Paul Rosenblatt, under surveillance.

	Arpaio denied the accusations.

	But in a recent e-mail exchange, Manning explained that during discovery in the Norberg case, his team learned just how closely Arpaio was mimicking the tactics of J. Edgar Hoover, the FBI director notorious for having files on everyone.

	"In late 1998, we found out that Arpaio had a 'dossier' on Judge Rosenblatt and [on] me," he wrote. "In January of '99, just before we were to disclose that and move for the production of those dossiers, Arpaio settled the case."

	In what he called a "Back to the Future moment," Manning pointed out that Rosenblatt is the federal judge on another big lawsuit of Manning's involving the senseless death of Army veteran Marty Atencio at Arpaio's Fourth Avenue Jail in December 2011.


more abuse of power

	The video of Atencio, who had a history of mental illness, in MCSO custody was disturbing. It showed an unprovoked attack by Phoenix cops and MCSO detention officers, what Manning calls a "jailers' riot."

	The 44-year-old Phoenician had been passive and generally cooperative following his arrest for erratic behavior.

	Nevertheless, Atencio was choked, tased, punched, kneed, stripped naked, and left to die in a holding cell.

	Atencio did not deserve this violent execution any more than Norberg — who also had been arrested for erratic behavior, albeit while on illicit drugs — deserved his.


Abusing prisoners

	Following reports that he might have been tailed by Arpaio's deputies, Romley conflicted himself off the Norberg case.

	The U.S. Attorney's Office chose not to prosecute on allegations surrounding the Norberg evidence or on the surveillance of public officials and a federal judge.

	It's a common pattern.

	No matter how vile, illegal, or unconstitutional Arpaio's actions, federal prosecutors here and in the U.S. Department of Justice have a risk-averse reputation when it comes to holding Arpaio accountable for his bad behavior.


Arpaio abuse of power obstructing justice

getting away with crimes

	For example, in 1997, then-U.S. Attorney for Arizona Janet Napolitano entered into a settlement with the MCSO of a DOJ lawsuit on constitutional violations in the jails, allowing Arpaio to avoid more serious ramifications.

	She was rewarded in 2002 when she ran for governor as a Democrat and Arpaio, a popular Republican, made a campaign commercial for her.

	Similarly in 2012, after a long investigation by the FBI into Arpaio's abuses of power, which included falsely charging Superior Court Judge Gary Donahoe with bribery, the U.S. Attorney's Office in Phoenix issued a cowardly statement of capitulation at 5 p.m. on the Friday before the Labor Day weekend, closing the case with no indictments.


quid-pro-quo with Janet Napolitano?

	As he mounts a 2016 re-election campaign for his seventh term in office, Arpaio can muster only a 38 percent approval rating, a recent poll shows.

	The sheriff is dogged by revelations that he initiated an investigation into Snow's wife over statements she allegedly made in a Mexican restaurant.

	Details of a 13-month MCSO investigation's use of a supposed Seattle computer guru as a confidential informant in an attempt to gin up a crazy conspiracy theory involving Snow, the DOJ, and other players, continue to embarrass Arpaio.

	His old rival, former Buckeye Police Chief Dan Saban, has announced a third run against Arpaio, this time in a GOP primary.

	And a serious movement to draft U.S. Marshal for Arizona David Gonzales for a run against Arpaio is expected to be filed this week with the Maricopa County Elections Office. A related website, RunDavidRun.com, already is live.

	In other words, the sharks are circling.


Arpaio kept abusing his power, but it didn't work out for him


------

http://boingboing.net/2014/03/13/fbi-recommended-felony-counts.html

	The FBI has turned over a redacted set of documents from its investigative archives related to Maricopa County, Arizona sheriff Joe Arpaio, a notorious strong-man whose antics have cost the taxpayers millions in civil suit settlements for actions ranging from racial profiling to stealing a defendant's paperwork in open court to arresting newspaper owners who refused to turn over readers' identities to torching a house and killing a puppy in the process of investigating traffic citations.

	The FBI archives, which go back to 2008, reveal that the Bureau recommended that some or all of former County Attorney Andrew Thomas, Arpaio and his officers be indicted for felony counts of "obstructing criminal investigations of prosecutions, theft by threats, tampering with witnesses, perjury and theft by extortion." This recommendation was ignored by federal prosecutors, who concluded that there was not enough evidence to proceed.


what


------

http://www.heatcity.org/2009/11/judge-orders-officer-to-apologize-or-face-jail-for-taking-attorneys-file.html
	...Donahoe’s ruling held Stoddard in contempt for the Oct. 19 incident in which he could be seen on a courtroom security video sneaking up behind attorney Joanne Cuccia in the middle of a hearing and taking a document from her file.

	During several days of testimony following the incident, Stoddard said he happened to have glanced at the file and saw the words “going to,” “steal” and “money” grouped together in a sentence. It made him think a crime was taking place and gave him the authority to pull the document, he said.


http://www.phoenixnewtimes.com/news/is-nothing-sacred-apparently-not-in-joe-arpaio-and-andrew-thomas-wacked-legal-world-6431742
	The detention officer removed three pages, the contents of a letter from defendant Antonio Lozano to his attorney, Cuccia, who works for the Office of the Legal Defender.

	The officer's maneuver was outrageous on several levels and, perhaps, unprecedented in Maricopa County.

	In fact, New Times could find no other case nationwide in which a detention officer or other courtroom security official had been caught poking around in a defense attorney's file without notifying a judge about his or her emergent concerns.


http://www.heatcity.org/2009/11/arpaio-to-judge-fat-chance-of-apology.html
	Sheriff Joe Arpaio said Wednesday it will be a cold day in Maricopa County before one of his officers apologizes for taking an attorney’s confidential files.

	...In the weeks since then, Donahoe, the county’s highest-ranking criminal judge, has ordered the sheriff’s office to explain why Stoddard believed he had the right to do that. After all, the files an attorney keeps are supposed to be protected by the attorney-client privilege, a near-sacred right in the legal community.


officer steals a lawyers file, all he has to do is apologize, Arpaio refuses

	...Amid all the back-and-forth, the original sentencing of Lozano, the Mexican Mafia member, has been put on a holding pattern. It had been scheduled for a do-over on Wednesday, but earlier this week, the original judge pushed it back to Dec. 14.

	Still, it’s uncertain whether the sentencing will even happen. Lozano’s new attorney, Maria Schaffer, said last week she plans to ask for the charges against him to be dropped in light of everything that’s happened. She declined to comment Wednesday about Donahoe’s ruling.


amazing

did the mafia guy get off?


------


http://www.phoenixnewtimes.com/news/joe-arpaio-loses-new-times-co-founders-win-375-million-settlement-for-2007-false-arrests-6651491
	Lacey was pleased with the settlement but expressed disbelief that the arrests ever occurred six years ago: "It was outrageous! Where in America do you arrest journalists for what they write?"

	The saga began in 2004, when then-New Times reporter John Dougherty dug into Arpaio's commercial real estate transactions, questioning how a county sheriff could amass so much cash to invest in property and why records of the transactions were hidden from public view.

	As part of Dougherty's articles, Arpaio's home address was published, as it was easily available online, including on government websites. The point was that Arpaio had hidden records of his commercial property but hadn't done so for his actual home.

	After Andrew Thomas took office as Maricopa County Attorney, Arpaio requested charges against New Times for revealing his home address, based on an arcane state statute that bars publishing such information on the Internet if there's a "timely threat" to an officer of the law.

	Because Arpaio waited 10 months to call for an investigation, a County Attorney's Office panel declined to prosecute, since no threat had presented itself. The Pinal County Attorney's Office later also declined to prosecute, citing lack of evidence and First Amendment implications.


abusing power, retaliating against journalists

	So 2 1/2 years after New Times published the sheriff's address, Arpaio and Thomas collaborated to appoint Phoenix attorney Dennis Wilenchik as a "special prosecutor" to go after the paper.

	He issued grand jury subpoenas for the notes, records, and sources of the paper's reporters and editors for all Arpaio-related stories over a broad period of time, as well as for the IP addresses of New Times' readers of such stories.

	Later, Superior Court Judge Anna Baca, who presided over county grand juries at the time, chided Wilenchik for trying to arrange a secret meeting with her about the case.

	Faced with all of this, Lacey and Larkin wrote a cover story detailing what they called a "breathtaking abuse of the constitution."

	Arpaio's deputies arrested them the night the story was published on charges of violating grand jury secrecy - alleged misdemeanor violations that normally don't spark nighttime arrests at suspects' homes.

	The next day, after widespread public outrage, Thomas announced that Wilenchik was dismissed as special prosecutor and that the investigation was over. Judge Baca later declared that Wilenchik's grand jury subpoenas were invalid, since he'd issued them without notice or approval from a grand jury or from the court.


Arpaio tries to subpeona newspaper for ip addresses of readers, arrest journalists who report on it.

	Arpaio and Wilenchik eventually sought immunity from Lacey and Larkin's lawsuit, but that didn't happen, leading to today's settlement. Thomas escaped potential liability because of protection his county attorney post afforded him when the episode occurred.


costs the state a bunch of money for nothing


-----


http://www.npr.org/sections/thetwo-way/2011/03/23/134803230/arizona-sheriff-uses-a-tank-to-arrest-cockfighting-suspect
	Arizona Sheriff Uses A Tank And Steven Seagal To Arrest Cockfighting Suspect

	Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio is normally in the news because of his tough stance on immigration. But since Monday, the sheriff has come under some criticism for an amazing show of force.

	Arpaio, reports Phoenix news station KPHO, used armored vehicles and a "tank" to execute a search warrant against Jesus Llovera, who was suspected of running a cockfighting ring.

	KPHO talked to Debra Ross, one of the neighbors, who was so shocked at the show of force, she called 911.

	"When the tank came in and pushed the wall over and you see what's in there, and all it is, is a bunch of chickens," Ross told KPHO.

	The Sheriff's Department says the use of force was appropriate, but Llovera's attorney told KPHO that the whole thing was "a stage, to help actor Steven Seagal's TV show, Lawman."

	The show was taping at the time and KPHO reports that Seagal was on the tank.


that actually sounds like fun

a waste of money though


https://www.forbes.com/sites/erikkain/2011/08/31/actor-steven-seagal-sued-for-driving-tank-into-arizona-home-killing-puppy/#1354ceff7489
	Actor Steven Seagal Sued for Driving Tank into Arizona Home, Killing Puppy


------

http://www.phoenixnewtimes.com/news/dog-day-afternoon-6438729

Arpaio burns down some guys house and kills his dog


------


http://archive.azcentral.com/news/politics/articles/20140306report-fbi-had-urged-charges-maricopa-county-inquiry.html?source=nletter-
	Federal investigators concluded there was sufficient evidence to bring charges against public officials during their years-long abuse-of-power investigation targeting Maricopa County law-enforcement agencies, according to heavily redacted records obtained by The Arizona Republic.

	The records indicate that FBI agents found probable cause to recommend felony counts of obstructing criminal investigations of prosecutions, theft by threats, tampering with witnesses, perjury and theft by extortion.

	Ultimately, federal prosecutors in August 2012 closed the three-year FBI criminal investigation and grand-jury probe into Sheriff Joe Arpaio, former County Attorney Andrew Thomas and their top deputies, saying there would be no indictments due to a lack of evidence or an insurmountable burden of proof.

	...The report makes clear that FBI agents believed evidence was strong enough to prosecute some of those under investigation.

Federal prosecutors left them hanging--why?

------

https://www.cbsnews.com/news/the-impostor/

Arpaio puts a con-man in charge of investigations


------


http://www.newyorker.com/news/news-desk/william-finnegan-on-sheriff-joe-arpaio
	That request didn’t get anywhere with the Bush Administration, but the Obama Administration has been a different story. In March, a group of Democratic congressional leaders asked Justice to launch a similar investigation, and it quickly did. Will it make any difference? I don’t know. Arpaio and his associates made a big show with me of not caring what federal investigators found or said. “I don’t bow down to the federal government,” Arpaio said. His chief deputy, who was about to meet, he said, with seven lawyers from Justice, actually said to me, “I’m going to shove it up their ass.” They seem to think they can bluster their way through anything from Washington.


Arpaio has long history of abuse, unrepentant, thinks they will get away with everything

and now, thanks to Trump...

	...The Maricopa County Sheriff’s Office specializes in primitive immigration sweeps, arresting gardeners and dishwashers whose papers are not in order. Why? From a public-safety standpoint, it’s not a rational allocation of resources. I’d say it’s because the raids are politically popular.

------

http://www.npr.org/2011/05/27/136725938/scandals-plague-controversial-arizona-sheriff
	...the 78-year old lawman now finds himself dealing with the kind of publicity no elected official wants.

	This week, Arpaio held a press conference to announce that two of his detention officers and a deputy were arrested for allegedly helping a Mexican drug cartel smuggle people and narcotics.

	"That a deputy sheriff would provide information and associate with these drug and human traffickers is despicable," he said.


Arpaio's posse helping illegal immigrants across the border?

I guess if he actually solved the problem, he wouldn't have much power

	...But the list of problems is getting longer. A local police department claims sheriff's deputies failed to fully investigate 400 sex crimes. Arpaio's chief deputy quit last month rather than be fired after an investigation found abuses of power and inappropriate activities. A financial audit discovered that the sheriff misspent $100 million to fund immigration sweeps and investigations into people who questioned his policies.


abuse of power

	Arpaio was elected sheriff of Maricopa County in 1992 after a 30-year career in the Drug Enforcement Administration. He runs Arizona's largest jail system, where he first gained attention for banning girlie magazines, serving inmates bologna sandwiches and forcing them to wear pink underwear.

	"He knew how to play the media," says Paul Charlton, a former U.S. attorney for Arizona. "He knew what policies that he could implement would draw media attention — not only in the state, I don't think in the country, but internationally. But he was at the same time, an individual — when I was in the U.S. attorney's office — who understood what it meant to be a good law enforcement officer."

knows how to play media like Trump

	..."I think Joe Arpaio lost his perspective. He lost his way and began to become more concerned with pursuing his political enemies than he did with doing what's right, than with doing justice," he says.


doesn't care about Justice


	...Arpaio has admitted as much and says he'll bring in outside consultants to help. But it may be too late. The Department of Justice is investigating Arpaio's office for its treatment of inmates and for alleged racial profiling during immigration sweeps. And the FBI and local U.S. attorney's office is looking into whether Arpaio abused his power by targeting elected officials and judges who publicly disagreed with his policies.


reporting on FBI investigation in 2011


------

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/powerpost/paloma/daily-202/2016/10/27/daily-202-sheriff-joe-arpaio-s-struggle-to-survive-explains-why-trump-may-lose-arizona/581150cbe9b69b640f54c6b5/?utm_term=.d5dfb5c6a27b

Arpaio helping Trump campaign


------

http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/arizonas-sheriff-joe-arpaio-lost-political-invincibility/
	...The election also provided more evidence that Arizona voters care little about immigration. Exit polls showed that only about 1 in 10 voters named immigration as the most important issue, and three-quarters said they supported a path to legal status for immigrants.


so how was he getting elected before?


	...The 84-year-old sheriff didn’t make any public appearances on Election Night, issuing a statement saying he was disappointed by the results but congratulated the winner, Paul Penzone.

	“My thanks and appreciation to the people of Maricopa County for the faith and trust they put in me over the years,” Arpaio said.

	His downfall proved partly tied to a criminal contempt-of-court charge for his acknowledged defiance of a judge’s order in a racial profiling case stemming from his immigration patrols. He also cost taxpayers $130 million to defend him in lawsuits over his tenure.


cost a lost of money -- $130 million

	...His image as a crime fighter was tarnished when his office failed to adequately investigate more than 400 sex-crimes cases, including dozens of allegations of child molestation, over a three-year period ending in 2007.


a reason for this? if he has a reputation for being like Hoover...

	...Taxpayers who have already paid $48 million in legal costs in the case will be feeling the financial pain for years. The costs are expected to reach $72 million, due in large part to court-ordered changes in the agency.


a big chunk added to the $130 million


------

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joe_Arpaio
	In the case of Braillard v. Maricopa County, the plaintiff's attorney cited numerous reports commissioned and paid for by Maricopa county, dating back as far as 1996, detailing a "culture of cruelty" where inmates were routinely denied humane healthcare at Maricopa County jails run by Arpaio. Testifying in this case, Arpaio stated he could not deny making the statement that even if he had a billion dollars he wouldn’t change the way he runs his jails.

	Arpaio said his jails were meant as places for punishment, and that the inhabitants were all criminals, although in fact most inmates had not been convicted of a crime and were awaiting trial.


abusing people not convicted of a crime

	Under Arpaio, the Maricopa County Sheriff's Office may have improperly cleared (reported as solved) as many as 75% of cases without arrest or proper investigation.


doesn't clear 82% of cases

	...During a three-year period ending in 2007, more than 400 sex crimes reported to Arpaio's office were inadequately investigated or not investigated at all. While providing police services for El Mirage, Arizona, the MCSO under Arpaio failed to follow through on at least 32 reported child molestations, even though the suspects were known in all but six cases. Many of the victims were children of illegal immigrants.


allows sexual abuse of children of illegal immigrants


http://archive.boston.com/news/nation/articles/2011/12/04/critics_tough_sheriff_botched_sex_crime_cases/?page=full
	El Mirage Detective Jerry Laird, who reviewed some the investigations, learned from a sheriff's summary of 50 to 75 cases files he picked up from Arpaio's office that an overwhelming majority of them hadn't been worked.

	That meant there were no follow-up reports, no collection of additional forensic evidence and zero effort made after the initial report of the crime was taken.


not even investigating

	Bill Louis, then-assistant El Mirage police chief who reviewed the files after the sheriff's contract ended, believes the decision to ignore the cases was made deliberately by supervisors in Arpaio's office -- and not by individual investigators.

	"I know the investigators. I just cannot believe they would wholesale discount these cases. No way," Louis said. "The direction had to come (from) up the food chain."

	Louis said he believes whoever made the decision knew that illegal immigrants -- who are often transient and fear the police -- were unlikely to complain about the quality of investigations. He said some cases also involved families here legally.


came from the top. A racial bias?

	...In April 2007, a 3-year-old girl was reported molested by her father, an illegal immigrant who cared for the child while her mother was at work. When the mother confronted her husband about the abuse, he cried and swore he'd never do it again.

	Yet a few days later, the mother noticed more signs of sexual abuse on her daughter and called for help. After the initial report, that help didn't come.

	The string of unresolved cases left Elizabeth Ditlevson, deputy director for the Arizona Coalition Against Domestic Violence, shaking her head. "My impressions were anger at the system and concern for the people whose cases weren't addressed," she said.


letting someone abuse a 3 year old

	...In their follow-up on the case of the 13-year-old attacked by the man claiming to have a broken car, El Mirage police discovered Arpaio's office hadn't interviewed the victim.

	An El Mirage detective went to the girl's home just off the city's main drag. The girl's uncle said she and her mother weren't around and took the investigator's card with a promise to ask them to call.

	The mother never called back. She and her daughter's whereabouts are unknown.

	The case of the molested 3-year-old was returned to El Mirage police unworked five months after the initial report. The family's beige tract home was deserted, the phone disconnected.


is there even a reason for this besides pure destruction?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joe_Arpaio
	In a controversial case, Arpaio's office was accused of ignoring Sabrina Morrison, a teenage girl suffering from a mental disability. On March 7, 2007, the 13-year-old was raped by her uncle, Patrick Morrison. She told her teacher the next day, and her teacher called the MCSO. A rape kit was taken, but the detective assigned to the case told Sabrina and her family that there were no obvious signs of sexual assault, no semen, or signs of trauma.[92]

	As a result of the detective's statements, Sabrina was branded by her family as a liar. Her uncle continued to rape her repeatedly, saying he would kill her if she told anyone. She became pregnant by him, and had an abortion. The family did not know that the rape kit had been tested at the state lab and showed the presence of semen. The lab requested that the detective obtain a blood sample from the suspect, Patrick Morrison.[93] Instead of obtaining the blood sample, or making an arrest, the detective filed the crime-lab note and closed the case for four years.


wtf is this

It's not just Arpaio, basically his entire department


	...In December 2011, responding to continuing media coverage of the controversy, and apparently unaware that there were hundreds of victims in these cases, Arpaio stated in a press conference, "If there were any victims, I apologize to those victims."


at best, Arpaio completely oblivious to widespread abuse in his dept.

although there is a pattern of this


------

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joe_Arpaio
	Between 2008 and 2010, Arpaio and former Maricopa County Attorney Andrew Thomas together undertook a number of government-corruption investigations targeting political opponents, including judges, county supervisors and administrators, resulting in filing of criminal charges against several individuals, lawsuits against the Maricopa County Board of Supervisors, and a federal civil-racketeering suit against the supervisors, four judges, and attorneys who worked with the county.[97]

	In early 2010, Arpaio and Thomas sought to have a grand jury indict a number of Maricopa County judges, Maricopa County supervisors, and employees of the Maricopa County Board of Supervisors. The grand jury, in an unusual rebuke, ordered the investigation ended. This action has been described as meaning that "the case is so bad, there's no further evidence that could be brought" to substantiate it. Legal experts agreed this was a rare move.[98]

	Arpaio and Thomas lost every case, either by ruling of the courts or by dropping the case.[99]

	Arpaio's and Thomas' actions in these matters led to Thomas' disbarment by a disciplinary panel of the Arizona Supreme Court, which found that Thomas "outrageously exploited power, flagrantly fostered fear, and disgracefully misused the law" while serving as Maricopa County Attorney. The panel found "clear and convincing evidence" that Thomas brought unfounded and malicious criminal and civil charges against political opponents, including four state judges and the Arizona Attorney General.[100] "Were this a criminal case," the panel concluded, "we are confident that the evidence would establish this conspiracy beyond a reasonable doubt."


so the investigations into political opponents, abuse of power, led to civil case, panel said "confident" would lead to criminal charges if not civil case.

Yet federal prosecutors declined to charge him.


	...In February 2010, Pima County Superior Court Judge John S. Leonardo found that Arpaio "misused the power of his office to target members of the Board of Supervisors for criminal investigation".[105]

	In 2008, a federal grand jury began an inquiry of Arpaio for abuse of power in connection with an FBI investigation.[106][107] On August 31, 2012, the Arizona U.S. Attorney's office announced that it was "closing its investigation into allegations of criminal conduct" by Arpaio, without filing charges.[108]

	Arpaio was investigated for politically motivated and "bogus" prosecutions, which a former U.S. Attorney called "utterly unacceptable".[106][107] Phoenix Mayor Phil Gordon called Arpaio's "long list" of questionable prosecutions "a reign of terror".


judge found he misused power of his office

	...Mike Lacey and Jim Larkin, the founders and leaders of the Phoenix New Times, were arrested after publishing a news article on a grand jury investigation involving Arpaio's office. On the evening that the article was published, Lacey and Larkin were arrested by plainclothes sheriff's deputies, "handcuffed, put in dark SUVs with tinted windows and driven to jail."[111] Following a public uproar over the arrests, all charges were dropped against Lacey and Larkin.


public outcry after the Lacey and Larkin arrests


	...Arpaio used the detention fund to pay for investigations of political rivals, as well as activities involving his human-smuggling unit.


misusing funds to pay for investigations of political rivals


	The analysis also showed a number of inappropriate spending items including a trip to Alaska where deputies stayed at a fishing resort, and trips to Disneyland.

	Separate investigations by The Arizona Republic uncovered widespread abuse of public funds and county policies by Arpaio's office, including high-ranking employees routinely charging expensive meals and stays at luxury hotels on their county credit cards.


and vacations for the good 'ol boys


	...In his September 2009 deposition in the case, Arpaio testified he had never read the complaint in the case, was unfamiliar with the details of the allegations of racial profiling therein, didn't know the content of the 14th Amendment to the U.S. Constitution, and had never read the Department of Justice's guidelines concerning the use of race in investigations, which would have applied to his deputies in the field when they were still operating under a 287(g) program agreement with U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE). He insisted, however, that his deputies didn't profile based on ethnicity or race.


testifies he doesn't know the constitution


	...In 2007 Manuel De Jesus Ortega Melendres, a Mexican tourist who was a passenger in a car stopped in Cave Creek, Maricopa County, filed a lawsuit (Melendres v. Arpaio[142]) in the United States District Court for the District of Arizona against Sheriff Arpaio, the Maricopa County Sheriff's Office, and Maricopa County, claiming to have been detained unlawfully for nine hours as a result of racial profiling. The lawsuit was expanded when several individuals joined in with similar complaints.


stops and searches a Mexican tourist?


	...In a December 2011 order, Judge Snow sanctioned Arpaio and the MCSO for acknowledged destruction of records in the case.

	...On July 24, 2015, the court directed U.S. marshals to seize evidence, which was possibly related to the contempt of court charges and was slated for destruction, from the sheriff's office.


obstruction of justice?


------


https://www.abqjournal.com/76894/judge-punishes-sheriff-arpaios-office-for-document-destruction.html
	PHOENIX — A judge overseeing a lawsuit that alleges racial profiling in Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio’s immigration patrols issued punishments against the agency on Friday for its acknowledged destruction of records in the case.

	...Some sheriff’s officials have acknowledged deleting their emails about the patrols and throwing away and shredding officers’ records of traffic stops made during the sweeps.

	The sheriff’s office said the destruction was an honest error that sprung from a top official not telling others in his office to preserve the documents.

	...Some sweeps-related emails that were thought to have been deleted by the sheriff’s office turned out to have been saved by the county when it was discovered that the county had backed up emails by the sheriff’s office as part of a routine document-preservation step in an unrelated lawsuit.


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2015/07/24/snow-orders-marshals--retrieve-mcso-evidence-abrk/30647253/
	U.S. marshals raided the Maricopa County Sheriff's Office on Friday in search of evidence after a court-appointed special monitor said the agency had withheld hundreds of documents a federal judge had ordered to be turned over months ago.

	Nearly 1,500 identification cards seized by sheriff's deputies had been marked for destruction in direct violation of U.S. District Judge G. Murray Snow's February order that the cards be turned over, the monitor said in a hearing Friday.

	Further, the monitor said, sheriff's officials had been instructed not to volunteer information to the monitors that the evidence existed.

	...The information comes weeks after e-mails between sheriff's detectives revealed the existence of 50 hard drives related to a confidential informant hired to provide information to Sheriff Joe Arpaio on Snow, all of which Snow had also ordered to be turned over.

	To date, court-appointed monitors had received only one hard drive. In an emergency hearing Friday, Snow ordered U.S. marshals to seize the rest.

	...But the case has continued to sprout legal offshoots throughout the two years since Snow's ruling, even as the county funnels millions into the embattled agency for court-ordered reforms.

	Arpaio and his top aides already have been accused of contempt of court for failing to abide by three of Snow's directives. Arpaio and Chief Deputy Jerry Sheridan have admitted to civil contempt, but ongoing hearings may persuade Snow to refer the office for criminal proceedings.

	One of the contempt allegations stemmed from a former deputy named Ramon "Charley" Armendariz, who took his life last year after a series of confrontations with police.

	Investigators found a stash of driver's licenses, passports, license plates and torn-up citations in Armendariz's home, indicating improper storage policies at best and, at worst, illegal seizures.

	The investigation also revealed that he and perhaps other deputies had been recording their own traffic stops, prompting Snow to order sheriff's officials to quietly collect the recordings.

	But any attempt at a covert internal investigation was squandered with an e-mail blast to command staff, giving Snow potential cause to find Arpaio in contempt of court.


would have thought that was obstruction of justice? but I guess this is contempt of court instead

	...In preparation for the April contempt-of-court hearing, Snow in February ordered Arpaio to produce "copies of identification documents seized by MCSO personnel from apparent members of the Plaintiff Class."

	...Warshaw added that the team learned there had been a meeting last Friday among Arpaio's professional-standards bureau staff, Sheridan and counsel to prepare for the monitors' site visit.

	"The 1,500 IDs did come up," Warshaw said, "and we learned that there was an instruction given: that the existence not be volunteered or given to the monitor."

	Warshaw said the IDs would have been destroyed if monitors had not intervened.


monitor says plotting to destroy more evidence


	...Following the same vein, Warshaw launched into an update on the hard drives they were supposed to receive from the Sheriff's Office.

	The hard drives originated from a Seattle computer programmer named Dennis Montgomery, who was hired as a confidential informant for Arpaio's office.

	Montgomery reportedly promised he could prove the federal government was colluding against Arpaio, who admitted in court that the data dump turned out to be "junk." Snow ordered all documentation turned over anyway.

	E-mails released this month suggest Montgomery had provided 50 to 60 hard drives in exchange for at least $120,000.

	This information, paired with the department's apparent attempt to withhold the IDs, prompted Snow's Friday order.

	"Somebody has to be held responsible sometime. ... And it's going to be now," Snow told Masterson.


this Montegomery guy trying to sell dirt on Feds to Arpaio?


------

http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2017/06/23/joe-arpaio-criminal-contempt-trial/418051001/
	Prosecutors have pushed back on this strategy in their pretrial court filings, arguing that the defense is attempting to politicize the case and deflect focus from the issue at hand. Criminal contempt is defined by a deliberate defiance of a court and is not a question of the underlying order.


politicizing on purpose?


	...In December 2011, months before the trial was to begin, Snow issued a preliminary injunction over the Sheriff's Office. The order banned deputies from detaining anyone solely on suspicion that they were undocumented immigrants and without cause to believe a crime had been committed.

	...information emerged that the Sheriff's Office continued to detain people suspected of being in the country illegally for at least 18 months after the judge’s preliminary order — up to May 2013 and maybe beyond. This and other allegations of court violations resulted in a civil-contempt trial that spanned several months in 2015.


ignoring another court order

	...Their filings have pushed back against nearly move defense attorneys attempted, their verbiage indicating thinly veiled exasperation.

	“Six days before trial is scheduled to begin and for the third time in four months, the defendant asks the Court to stay proceedings,” prosecutors opened in their response to the matter.

	“It’s been something that’s been in the works since 2007, right after Obama took office, and now here we are, 10 years later,” he said. “I’ll be glad to get this over with.”


10 years of this guy dodging criminal prosecution for Trump to pardon him


------

http://oldarchives.courthousenews.com/2015/12/14/arpaio-jailer-was-a-gangster-inmate-says.htm

http://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:GSUSFejjWuQJ:oldarchives.courthousenews.com/2015/12/14/arpaio-jailer-was-a-gangster-inmate-says.htm+&cd=14&hl=en&ct=clnk&gl=us
	Arpaio Jailer Was a Gangster, Inmate Says

	PHOENIX (CN) - One of Sheriff Joe Arpaio's jailers tried to have an informant's cell door opened so members of the Mexican Mafia could beat the hell out of him, he claims in court.

	Antonio Lechuga sued Maricopa County, Sheriff Arpaio and Detention Officer Kevin Holsom on Dec. 10 in Superior Court.

	 Lechuga claims Holsom told members of the Mexican Mafia that he was working as "an informant for Jail Intel" at Maricopa County's Fourth Avenue Jail.

	Arizona media reported in January this year that detention officer Kevin Holsome, then 29, was charged with belonging to a criminal street gang. Aside from the spelling of Holsom's name, the reports resemble the allegations in Lechuga's lawsuit.


Mexian mafia in with Arpaio's crew?

	Lechuga claims that on Dec. 12, 2014, Holsom yelled so loudly that all the inmates in the jail pod could hear him say that Lechuga is a "snitch and rat."

	As if that weren't enough, Lechuga says, the next day "Holsom went into the Tower and talked to Lechuga over the intercom. Holsom threatened Lechuga that he would 'fuck him up.'"

	He claims that Holsom then "contacted a known Mexican Mafia member through the intercom and made arrangements to open Lechuga's cell while at the same time opening the cells of other Mexican Mafia members so that they could physically attack Lechuga."

	...Lechuga says he agreed to be an informant after the Maricopa County Sheriff's Office agreed his identity would be kept confidential.


sounds like it


	...The Mexican Mafia is a violent prison gang that is believed to control heroin trafficking in areas of major cities from inside prisons.


hmmm


------


http://www.nydailynews.com/news/national/3-cops-america-toughest-sheriff-joe-arpaio-busted-role-drug-human-smuggling-ring-article-1.142730
	Three Arizona cops smuggled drugs and humans and laundered money for a vast narco-trafficking ring, all under the nose of the self-proclaimed "America's toughest sheriff," authorities said.

	One of the moles, a female corrections officer, was carrying the love child of a cartel capitán, and all three were accused of leaking sheriff's office tips to help the ring guide smugglers, drugs and cash through the area from Mexico, authorities said.

	...The early morning raids capped a year-long investigation into the ring, which is suspected of funneling loads of heroin into the Valley area west of Phoenix.

	...The arrests were a blow to the tough-talking Sheriff Arpaio, who has been resisting calls to step down amid allegations of corruption, misspending and racial profiling in his office.

	The smuggling ring moved $56,000 of heroin into the area each week, cops said, and each of the dirty cops played a crucial role in keeping the operation underground.



http://www.nbcnews.com/id/43164223/ns/us_news-crime_and_courts/t/arpaio-deputy-faces-human-smuggling-charges/
	Deputy Ruben Navarette, Hernandez, and detention officer Sylvia Najera face felony charges. Seven other sheriff's employees were being investigated for their possible involvement.


http://www.azfamily.com/story/28392056/corruption-case-dismissed-against-former-arizona-deputy
	Corruption case dismissed against former Arizona deputy

	PHOENIX (AP) -- A corruption case against a former Arizona sheriff's deputy accused of helping a heroin smuggling ring was formally dismissed Tuesday after key wiretap evidence had to be tossed out.

	The move was expected after prosecutors took the blame recently for failing to file a wiretap application with the court in the case involving former sheriff's Deputy Alfredo Navarrette, a one-time member of Sheriff Joe Arpaio's anti-smuggling squad.

	Without that document, prosecutors had to reverse themselves and ask a judge to dismiss charges against Navarrette and five others, including two other former sheriff's employees and the man accused of being the ring leader. Authorities say the ring leader was working with a high-ranking Sinaloa drug cartel figure.

	Prosecutors also are seeking to void convictions they secured against 11 others who have already pleaded guilty to drug charges in the case.

	The collapse comes as a judge presiding over a racial profiling case against the sheriff's office has grown frustrated over what he said were inadequate internal investigations into wrongdoing by Arpaio's smuggling squad, including whether another former deputy was shaking down immigrants who were in the country illegally.

	...Maricopa County Attorney Bill Montgomery's office, which was prosecuting Navarrette, declined comment Tuesday.

	More than two weeks ago, Montgomery took blame for the missing wiretap application. "This is our mistake," Montgomery said. "We have to own it."

	Arpaio's office didn't immediately respond to a request for comment at midday Tuesday.


what is Montgomery up to? letting corrupt Arpaio deputy get away with it on a technicality


http://www.eastvalleytribune.com/local/article_a81436ba-b237-11df-b5b8-001cc4c002e0.html
	Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio's 2012 re-election campaign committee will be fined for sending out mailers deemed illegal by the county election department's finance committee because they sought the defeat of Interim Maricopa County Rick Romley.

	The order, determined by Jeff Messing, legal counsel to the Maricopa County Attorney's Office, said the Arpaio committee sent out mailers that effectively advocated against Romley or in favor of Romley's Republican primary foe, Bill Montgomery, in Tuesday's election.


------


http://archive.azcentral.com/news/politics/articles/20120404joe-arpaio-federal-investigation-county-response.html
	Maricopa County Attorney Bill Montgomery accused federal officials of spreading misinformation and trying to foment unrest in Maricopa County by not providing proof that Sheriff Joe Arpaio's agency engages in discriminatory police practices.

	Montgomery on Wednesday made his strongest statements yet about the investigation into Arpaio's office, calling on the U.S. Department of Justice to "put up or shut up" by disclosing what evidence it has in its case.


and then they start destroying evidence



------


http://www.pressherald.com/2012/07/24/ariz-sheriff-back-tracks-on-kkk-support/
	Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio, testifying in defense at a civil trial, was questioned about statements that critics say show prejudiced thinking.

	Plaintiffs’ lawyers asked Arpaio about a statement in which he called illegal immigrants “dirty” and another that seemed to express admiration for the Ku Klux Klan.

	Arpaio said the statement about immigrants was taken out of context, adding that if a person were to cross the U.S.-Mexico border on foot over four days in the desert that person “could be dirty. That’s the context on how I used that word.”

	He also was asked about a 2007 appearance on a national cable television news show. CNN host Lou Dobbs spoke with Arpaio at the time about comparisons between his department and the KKK, about which the sheriff said, “I think it’s an honor. It means we are doing something.”

	Arpaio on Tuesday said he said he doesn’t consider the comparison an honor, adding that he has no use for the KKK.


------


http://www.newyorker.com/magazine/2009/07/20/sheriff-joe
	Protesters materialized, many waving homemade placards urging Arpaio to leave. Motorists honked in support. Guadalupe’s young mayor, Rebecca Jiménez, confronted Arpaio in a parking lot where he had established his mobile command center. Why, she wanted to know, did his press release say that Guadalupe town officials were alarmed about illegal aliens in their midst? They were not. Arpaio went ballistic. “He was waving his arms like a crazy man,” Jiménez told me. “I had to wipe the spit off my face. He said, ‘You’re the one that caused all these riots!’ He said he was going to come back the next day. I said we didn’t want him. They did come back. But he didn’t.”

	Arpaio chose to direct the next day’s Guadalupe operation, which was more modest, from a remote command post, and Jiménez was hailed, at least in some circles, for her courage. The two-day raid netted only nine suspected illegal immigrants, but reportedly produced a high volume of traffic tickets, including charges for “improper use of horn.” Jiménez noted that the raid came in the middle of an election campaign. “He used our community to get media attention,” she said. “You know, Brown Town. But he got more than he bargained for.”

	The Guadalupe raid did have a chilling effect. It began the day before a Catholic-church confirmation ceremony—a big deal in Guadalupe—was scheduled to take place in the village plaza, and although the children had prepared for months, a number of them were afraid to come out, and missed their own confirmations.

	America’s toughest sheriff is, as ever, unapologetic. Over lunch in New York, he told me that he doesn’t mind the effect he has. “If they’re afraid to go to church, that’s good.” 


Arpaio raiding a town, protests appear, kids can't go to church, and possibly all to boost his election chances?


I wonder if he says nutty shit only to liberal journalists on purpose


------



http://archive.azcentral.com/arizonarepublic/news/articles/2008/10/17/20081017MCSOoperation1017.html
	Arpaio denied questions about whether the raid was politically motivated or that it was timed to deflect attention from a videotape that surfaced Wednesday depicting the brutal death of an inmate at a county jail, which his office runs. The inmate's family has filed intent to sue the county.


interesting


http://www.nbcnews.com/id/24314764/ns/us_news-life/t/sheriff-raising-furor-immigration-raids/
	A total of 150 people — 73 of them illegal immigrants — were arrested by Arpaio's deputies in the raids on heavily Hispanic sections in late March and early April.

	"I was upset. We did not request them here," said Guadalupe Mayor Rebecca Jimenez, who charged that the patrols were meant to raise Arpaio's profile for his re-election campaign this year.


http://www.eastvalleytribune.com/news/guadalupe-leaders-angry-with-arpaio/article_aa65a685-c6ed-50ce-96b1-3cfbfc9a95d2.html


raids small town with a helicopter and a bunch of swat, arrests 26 people, 5 illegal immigrants, mayor cries and calls Phoenix to have them do their police instead, Arpaio gets good TV ratings


nothing mentioning picking people out of a church

closest to that is picking a bunch of people out of Mesa city hall


------


https://www.researchgate.net/profile/Chris_Lukinbeal2/publication/279243692_Performing_Americas_Toughest_Sheriff_media_as_practice_in_Joe_Arpaios_Old_West/links/55c021eb08ae092e9666a700.pdf


paper talking about how Arpaio plays the media, some mumbo-jumbo, goes into his controversies


pg 9

	These problems cannot be
so easily dismissed, as abuse of power and scare tactics
mar his 20-year tenure. There is reason to believe,
moreover, that Arpaio’s tactics are more ineffective
than his rhetoric would have us suppose. In 1998
Heburn and Griffin, Professors of Criminal Justice
Studies, found that recidivism in Arpaio’s Maricopa
County jail system showed no significant improve-
ment in the rate at which inmates returned to jail
(Hepburn and Griffin 1998).


didn't help much?


	...As an acting police chief for the
City of Buckeye with over 20 years of law enforce-
ment experience Saban was gaining on Arpaio in 2008
until an ad slandering Saban as a rapist ran against him
(Zimney 2008). 2 Saban was quick to respond stating,
‘‘Joe Arpaio is running a TV ad that twists the facts
about my experiences as a victim of child abuse.’’
‘‘Yes, I was abused as a child and that is a fact. But for
Arpaio to call me a rapist, when he knows I was the
victim of child abuse, is a cowardly lie’’ (quoted in
Zimney 2008, para. 6). Although the ad only ran
1 day, the branding was done and Saban lost the race.


also opened an investigation into him for it



------

2001

http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2001/may/28/20010528-023346-7901r/
	Mexicans, Russian mob new partners in crime

	The recent seizure of 20 tons of cocaine from two "fishing boats" manned by Russian and Ukrainian crewmen has raised concerns that Mexican drug smugglers are doing business with the Russian mafia.

	U.S. intelligence sources believe drug cartels in Mexico, considered among the worlds most ruthless, have followed the lead of Colombian cocaine smugglers to form alliances with the Russian mob and other Eastern European crime organizations. Led by the Arellano-Felix cartel in Tijuana, the sources said those alliances have been firmly established and involve the shipment of both cocaine and heroin.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sinaloa_Cartel#Allegations_of_collusion_with_US_federal_government
	In March 2015, BBC TV programme This World broadcast an episode entitled "Secrets of Mexico's Drug War"[73] which reported on the US government's Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives' Operation Fast and Furious which had allowed licensed firearms dealers to sell weapons to illegal buyers acting on behalf of Mexican drug cartel leaders, in particular the Sinaloa Cartel.[74] The BBC also reported on Vicente Zambada Niebla's claims of immunity from prosecution under a deal between the Mexican and US governments and his claims that the Sinaloa Cartel's leaders had provided US federal agents with information about rival Mexican drug gangs.[75] In the same documentary it is shown that the US Justice Department invoked national security reasons to prevent Humberto Loya Castro, the lawyer of the Sinaloa Syndicate, from being summoned as a witness to the trial against Vicente Zambada Niebla.


wtf


http://world.time.com/2014/01/14/dea-boosted-mexican-drug-cartel/
	The U.S. government allowed the Mexican Sinaloa drug cartel to carry out its business unimpeded between 2000 and 2012 in exchange for information on rival cartels, an investigation by El Universal claims.

	Citing court documents, the Mexican newspaper reports that DEA officers met with top Sinaloa officials over fifty times and offered to have charges against cartel members dropped in the U.S., among other pledges.


https://www.forbes.com/sites/rickungar/2014/01/14/was-operation-fast-and-furious-really-part-of-a-secret-deal-between-the-dea-and-mexicos-sinaloa-drug-cartel/#6bfe7d8323a1
	Was Operation Fast And Furious Really Part Of A Secret Deal Between The DEA And Mexico's Sinaloa Drug Cartel?


what's up with that


Sinaloa infiltrating Arpaio's posse, and DEA?

Apraio also with DEA for awhile


not sure what's going on here

exactly how corrupt is Arpaio?



------


http://www.foxnews.com/world/2014/06/02/officer-suicide-complicates-sheriff-arpaio-racial-profiling-case.html
	PHOENIX (AP) –  When sheriff's deputy Ramon Charley Armendariz hanged himself, he left behind a house full of questions.

	Among the items at his house were a stash of drugs, evidence bags from old cases, hundreds of fake IDs and thousands of his video-recorded traffic stops that were withheld in a racial-profiling case against his boss, Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio.

	Now, the quest for answers has raised the possibility that a yet-to-be-determined number of his cases could be thrown out and has refocused attention on Arpaio and his department, already under close watch by a federal monitor in the profiling case.

	The judge overseeing the case has raised the prospect that Armendariz may have been shaking down people living in the U.S. illegally during traffic stops, and the top prosecutor in Phoenix described the situation as a "mess" as his staff begins to sort it out.

	Arpaio's lawyer says the agency hopes Armendariz was a lone rogue officer. "I don't know what triggered him," said Arpaio, whose territory includes the Phoenix area.


this is interesting.

Was Armendariz going to talk?


	...Arpaio's office was sued over allegations that officers systematically racially profiled Latinos, and went on trial over the accusations. Armendariz was a witness, testifying that he never used race as a factor in making a traffic stop.

	U.S. District Judge Murray Snow later ruled Arpaio's deputies — including Armendariz — had in fact racially profiled Latinos and implemented a series of remedies, including a monitor to help carry out the reforms.


so did Armendariz lie?

	The deputy had other issues during his tenure.

	Job evaluations obtained by The Associated Press through a public records request documented a flaw in his police work that later emerged — that he had a problem turning in reports. At his house, officers found criminal citations that he wrote but were never prosecuted because he didn't turn in paperwork.

	His employment file shows he was reprimanded in 2010 after an internal affairs investigation concluded he failed to turn in a report for an unspecified incident while working off-duty security during a baseball game at Chase Field.

	Immediately under the section documenting the reprimand, there's a handwritten note with an illegible signature: "Charlie, Thanks for your hard work."


so there's a whole bunch of evidence bags, reports never turned in in his house.

and they investigate him for it but then say "Thanks for your hard work."


what was he supposed to be doing for them? hiding evidence from feds, others?


	...On May 1, Armendariz was wearing only his boxer shorts and firing a pepper ball gun at an imaginary burglar in his garage. Police believe he was either high on drugs or having a manic episode. Investigators found what they believed to be marijuana, methamphetamines, cocaine and LSD in the home.

	They arrested him, and one day later, he took part in a 90-minute interview with investigators, saying he was innocent and accusing other smuggling squad members of wrongdoing. The deputy then stopped talking and quit his job.

	Police went to Armendariz's home again days later after friends worried he would harm himself. After a nearly nine-hour barricade situation, he surrendered peacefully and was taken to a psychiatric center. Later that week, Armendariz was found dead at his home.


accuses coworkers of wrongdoing, later found dead


	...Maricopa County Attorney Bill Montgomery, the top county prosecutor for metropolitan Phoenix, said his office will examine whether the materials from the house will affect cases involving the deputy, though he doesn't think it's likely that those cases will be overturned.

	"If that has to result in prosecutions being dismissed, so be it," he said.


what's that supposed to mean? Montgomery sketchy

but top of article says some of Arpaio's cases could be thrown out, makes sense if widespread corruption in Maricopa police

some kind of bargain reached? some would prefer not to let certain criminals go if they revealed widespread corruption



http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2015/05/31/mcso-deputy-ramon-armendariz-death-internal-investigations/28178147/
	Effects of 'rogue' MCSO deputy's actions still unclear

	Days before Ramon "Charley" Armendariz would be found dead, he phoned Lydia Guzman, a confidant and local Latino civil-rights advocate.

	The former Maricopa County Sheriff's deputy seemed desperate, Guzman said.

	In the past several hours, Armendariz had resigned, engaged in a dramatic nine-hour standoff with police and was arrested in connection with drug and drug-paraphernalia charges.

	A search of his north Phoenix home unearthed an incriminating yet puzzling stash of personal property. The trove included several hundred items of evidence, including license plates, credit cards, driver's licenses and torn-up citations.

	"It's not mine, it's not all mine," Guzman recalls Armendariz telling her, through sobs.


planted it on him?  not completly sure, I guess these are things they'd rather found on a "rouge" deputy and not on the department over all? still doesn't make sense to me if some of this evidence implicates department, Arpaio

	It would have been easy to doubt this account. Armendariz, a former member of the agency's controversial human-smuggling unit, had been acting increasingly erratic and paranoid, and on May 8, 2014, was found hanged. A 35-minute "goodbye" video was left behind.


sounds like actually killed himself?


	But Armendariz was vindicated on April 23, when a federal judge confirmed in court that he was, at least in some ways, telling the truth.

	In a contempt of court hearing for Sheriff Joe Arpaio and four of his top aides stemming from a 2007 class-action racial-profiling suit, U.S. District Judge G. Murray Snow briefly questioned Chief Deputy Jerry Sheridan about the human-smuggling unit's proper handling of evidence.

	"The truth was that the property found at Armendariz's house was often not seized by Armendariz, was it?" Snow asked rhetorically of Sheridan, one of the officials named in the contempt allegations. "It was seized by other deputies."


right, other deputies seizing certain items of evidence, somehow end up in Armendariz's house


	In the year since his death, Armendariz has inadvertently helped launch dozens of internal and criminal investigations into his coworkers, prompted a contempt-of-court allegation against his bosses, and fixed a spotlight on what critics say are "heinous" internal investigations by the Sheriff's Office.

	Records released late last week shed more light on the cracks in the department's internal affairs procedures. The reports revealed insufficient deputy oversight and responses to citizen complaints, but failed to mention any of the criminal investigations or answer how the misappropriated evidence found itself in Armendariz's garage.


the garage where Armendariz was shooting an "imaginary" burglar


	In an interview with The Arizona Republic, Sheridan said the office's best theory is that the evidence was put into boxes when the unit was moving. Instead of transporting the evidence to the new office, Sheriff's officials believe Armendariz took it home.

	Sheridan said there's no indication the property was improperly seized, but several officers will be penalized for failing to properly impound the evidence, a policy violation. Sheriff's officials also say they have since retooled their internal affairs and oversight into a more structured, checks-and-balances system.

	But the full reach of Armendariz's actions remains to be seen. While Arpaio's camp maintains the notion that Armendariz was a "rogue" deputy and that officials have closed the supervisory gaps, critics say the revelations point to widespread departmental failures and provide grounds for broader court oversight of the embattled agency.


so basically department is lying, some kind of conspiracy moving all that there


	The life and death of Charley Armendariz is a study of complexity. He was Latino, but accused of racially profiling his own. He was consistently praised as one of the agency's hardest workers in immigration enforcement, but began leaking information to Guzman, a sworn foe of Arpaio.

	A former boyfriend said in a deposition that Armendariz had wanted to be a cop since he was a little boy, but became disheartened with his agency when he started to get picked on for being gay.

	And he was one of only a handful of deputies called to testify in a racial-profiling trial in the summer of 2012. Plaintiffs said Arpaio's force routinely targeted Latinos in their traffic operations.

	Snow mentioned Armendariz's statements and those of many others in his May 2013 ruling that the Sheriff's Office used race as a factor in making law-enforcement decisions.


they decide to pin it on the guy always wanted to be a cop since he was a kid, picked on for being different

shit really is like a movie

Arpaio is the comically over-the-top villain


	...In an interview this month, Sheridan said the revelations from Armendariz's home prompted 63 separate internal investigations and 46 criminal investigations into employees. Some of the internal investigations are still pending, but Sheridan said 15 employees will be disciplined, mostly for mishandling of evidence that was linked to officers other than Armendariz.

	All of the criminal investigations have now been closed. There will be no charges filed.


oh well that wraps it up then

	...Potentially mishandled evidence, grounds for an internal investigation, wasn't limited to Armendariz's home. License plates were tacked to the walls of HSU headquarters as trophies, according to courtroom testimony. Boxes and lockers at former HSU facilities were stuffed with hundreds of IDs and dozens of license plates that were never submitted to the evidence room.

	The personal property items, he said, the license plates and ID cards, legally belonged to the state after a confiscation.

	"Most police agencies just throw them away," he said of the license plates.


but liscence plates and ID's could be useful for committing certain crimes...

identity theft? smuggling?


	...In addition to the drugs and evidence found in Armendariz's home, officials discovered more than 500 DVDs in which Armendariz had recorded himself conducting traffic stops.

	The footage has yet to be publicly released, but has been described as "bizarre" by the court's monitoring team.

	According to its report, Armendariz favored a pattern of traffic stops that included inappropriate language, searching pocketbooks for no reason while requesting an ID and arresting then releasing people for minor violations.

	The mere existence of the videos served as grounds for contempt of court. The videos signaled that the Sheriff's Office had not turned over all the evidence it was required to provide during the initial racial-profiling proceedings.

	But the content also spoke to concerns about Armendariz's supervisors. Why wasn't he flagged earlier?


Armendariz illegal detentions, searches, seizures?

point to widespread problem



------


https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download


findings from case Menendariz vs Arpaio

also a summary of findings:

http://kjzz.org/content/308856/10-key-findings-civil-contempt-ruling-against-sheriff-joe-arpaio
	...Because of these deficiencies and others, Snow determines that at least four internal investigations are either invalid or void. One investigation was supposed to evaluate supervisors’ failures in overseeing Ramon “Charley” Armendariz, a former deputy and star of the Human Smuggling Unit who hung himself after drugs, illegal weapons, a cache of IDs, license plates, credit cards and other items were discovered in his garage.


drugs, illegal weapons, IDs, liscense plates, credit cards

all very useful things for criminals


	The other internal investigations were into the misconduct related to the items in Armendariz’s garage (more on that in item 8) and allegations that deputies had a widespread practice of seizing identifications and other possessions, including from Latino drivers in the plaintiff class.


so they seize IDs on purpose--seems like most of these would be from legal citizens, not illegal immigrants? maybe could sell them to illegal immigrants or something. Not sure but point is there would be a market for IDs in Arizona, especially of Latinos

on the other hand, would be pretty blatant crime to just steal a citizens ID... but if it was an illegal immigrant, can take, say fake ID, and threaten to deport

sort of keeping illegal immigration around to exploit it

then sell back IDs to immigrants or something


	...In May 2014 the sheriff’s office discovered one of its deputies in the Human Smuggling Unit, Ramon "Charley" Armendariz, had stashed an illegal weapon, hundreds of IDs, license plates, credit cards, cell phones, drugs, CDs and videos of his own traffic stops in his garage. Armendariz resigned and hung himself at his home days later.

	Immediately Snow raised questions about whether Armendariz was shaking down immigrants.

	Before Armendariz died, he alleged in an interview with the MCSO that the items in his garage belonged to the entire Human Smuggling Unit. He said a female coworker removed items stored in HSU offices and placed them in his garage because she “got word of an upcoming inspection by the Internal Affairs Division.” Though Montoya initially denied any involvement, she later acknowledged dropping some items off at Armendariz's residence and loading other items into his vehicle.

		But Snow finds that “[e]ven after Officer Montoya confessed as much, there was no further investigation or reassessment of her involvement, or that of anyone else, in the possible mishandling or theft of property in either an administrative or a criminal investigation.”

	Montoya was apparently spared from taking a polygraph test after experiencing a panic attack, according to testimony in the contempt hearing. Neither she nor anyone else received any discipline in connection to the items in the garage that were apparently stolen from members of the public.


sounds like they were trying to hide the evidence in Armendirez's home, didn't really try with internal investigation

	One of the items that was investigated was a license plate that belonged to a woman by the name of Manuela Ruiz Hernandez. Snow’s ruling says Hernandez reported that a female deputy took the plate after asking her if she was a citizen, a Mexican and whether she was “illegal” and a “wetback.” Snow writes there is evidence the stop was made by Deputy Amie Duong, but MCSO only sustained allegations of misconduct against the deceased Armendariz, not Duong.

	Snow also finds the sheriff’s office purposely delayed internal investigations related to Armendariz’s garage so they could not be evaluated in the evidentiary hearing.


wtf is this

some kind of racist shakedown operation


	After the discovery of all of the IDs in Armendariz’s garage in May 2014, Snow wanted to know if there was a widespread practice of improperly seizing IDs from the public, and the plaintiff class of Latino motorists in particular. He ordered any IDs in the possession of the MCSO should be turned over to the court. The sheriff’s office was also under an order to notify the court as soon as there is an internal affairs investigation that relates to this case.

	In early July a sergeant tried to put 1,459 IDs in the agency’s Property and Evidence department for destruction. The supervisor, who was aware of the court order, refused. Internal Affairs investigators were notified about the IDs, as was one of the sheriff’s attorneys, Michele Iafrate.

	The sheriff’s office did not notify the court’s independent monitoring team about the IDs or the internal investigation into them, since Iafrate said she was going to research whether the IDs in this instance fell under the court’s order. Chief Deputy Jerry Sheridan suspended the investigation.


trying to pull all sorts of tricks to get rid of these IDs

	When members of the monitor’s team visited later that July, they sat down in a meeting with several members of the sheriff’s staff. Testimony varies on the exact question asked, but a monitor asked either if there were any other pending investigations regarding IDs, or if anymore IDs had been found.

	Captain Steve Bailey, the head of the Professional Standard Bureau, testified in the contempt hearing that, “I was asked the question, and I just glanced at [Iafrate], and she looked at me and said no.”

	Snow finds Bailey, Iafrate and Sheridan violated his orders.

		“When Captain Bailey answered “no” to the Monitor’s question pertaining the identifications, regardless of the phrasing of the question, he knowingly violated the orders of the Court. Chief Deputy Sheridan, Captain Bailey, and Ms. Iafrate violated the specific and direct orders of this Court without a justifiable basis for doing so.”

	It remains to be seen if this finding will have any ramifications for Iafrate. The State Bar of Arizona can choose to investigate cases where there are allegations that an attorney has violated the rules of professional conduct.


hiding IDs from monitor

------


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2017/06/30/sides-rest-cases-joe-arpaio-criminal-contempt-trial/441674001/
	Lydia Guzman, a civil-rights activist and longtime Arpaio foe, called the trial “painful” to watch.

	“I love the DOJ, but I think that they probably could have sent some more experienced lawyers,” she said. “I think this is administration stuff.”

	Guzman said she believed President Donald Trump’s Department of Justice held off on assigning its more seasoned attorneys to the case.

	Arpaio was one of Trump’s earliest supporters, and the two share matching hard-line immigration platforms.


interesting.


this also says President asked about dropping case into him before:

https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/trump-asked-sessions-about-closing-case-against-arpaio-an-ally-since-birtherism/2017/08/26/15e5d7b2-8a7f-11e7-a94f-3139abce39f5_story.html


------


http://kjzz.org/content/308856/10-key-findings-civil-contempt-ruling-against-sheriff-joe-arpaio#one
	“If a judge makes a finding that the head of one of the largest law enforcement agencies in the state made an intentional misrepresentation under oath and did so more than once, that is something that a prosecutor especially, a federal prosecutor, should be paying very close attention to — regardless of whether the judge eventually refers that case to the US Attorney’s office for prosecution,” Charlton said.


Arpaio guilty of perjury? is he pardoned from that too?


------

http://www.azfamily.com/story/36173576/man-gets-arizona-prison-term-for-selling-fake-id-documents
	According to court documents, Carlos-Reyes sold numerous fraudulent documents to individuals in the Phoenix area from July 2014 through December 2015.

	The documents included Arizona driver's licenses, Social Security cards containing numbers belonging to legitimate Arizona residents and a lawful permanent resident card know as a green card.

	When he was arrested in August 2016, authorities say Carlos-Reyes was illegally in possession of a firearm.


so, at least one person guilty of selling fake or stolen IDs in Maricopa. Sentenced recently.

mean anything? I guess question is where did he get them.

------

http://www.azcentral.com/story/opinion/editorial/2017/07/31/joe-arpaio-guilty-but-hold-cheers-now/526730001/


azcentral sad at damage Arpaio did to county


------

https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download
	213. In  the  spring  of  2014,  the  Phoenix  Police  Department  responded  to  a  call  concerning  Deputy  Charley  Armendariz,  who  was  a  significant  MCSO  witness  in  the  underlying trial. 


Armendariz was a "significant MSCO witness"

pg 41


Arpaio agrees to inform monitor of any investigations, goes and sends email out to all commanders about gathering evidence videos anyway without telling monitor


pg 46

indications officers "highly selective" about the clips they turned in or might have simply declined to turn in responsive clips

pg 49

	The   Armendariz   search   uncoveredmore   than   1600   items   includingapproximately 500 drivers’ licenses, “tons”of license plates, weapons, illegal drugs bothin  MCSO  evidence  bags  and  otherwise  including  methamphetamine,  marijuana,  LSD,heroin, and oxycodone, a black purse with items in it, vehicle registrations, cell phones,wallets,  a  scale,  drug  paraphernalia,  thumbdrives,  memory  cards,  currency,  and  otheritems of personal property.  (Ex. 2874A;see alsoDoc. 1043 at Tr. 973–74; Doc. 1417 at1549;  Doc.  1556  at  Tr.  3245.)    All  of  theseitems  were  apparently  taken  from  peopleduring HSU stops.  (Doc. 1556 at Tr. 3246.)With the very few exceptions noted below,these items have never been the subject of any administrative investigations. 


court believes all of these were taken during Human Smuggling Unit stops

	...281.Cisco   Perez,   an   HSU   deputy   terminated   for   untruthfulness,   madegeneralized allegations in his subsequent state unemployment hearing.  These allegationsincluded   that   HSU   officers   commonly   “pocketed”   shirts,   flags,   statues,   drugparaphernalia,  and  on  at  leastone  occasion  a  62  inch  flat  screen  television  “for  trainingpurposes”  during  their  operations  with  the  approval  of  their  supervisors.    (Ex.  2006  atMELC011163.) 


hmmm


pg 86-87

says supervision of Armendariz was lax


pg 91

allegation that possible theft of $300 by Armendariz wasn't acted on by Sergeant Madrid


pg 97

Armendariz has weed in his cop car but cops don't care


pg 104

	The  Armendariz  matter,  therefore,provided  an  abundance  of  evidence  to  support  the  Perez  allegations,  evidence  that  wasotherwise  relatively  sparse.   Unlike  the  Armendariz  search,  which  yielded  existing  andpotentially  traceable  evidenceof  misappropriation  of  itemsof  value,  the  Cisco  Perez  allegations referenced no specific property other than a large screen TV. 


evidence backing up the "pocketing" items during stops allegations

very much of a problem when combined with the "are you can illegal immigrant" questions they keep asking.

Basically can stop someone, ask if illegal immigrant, if they know or guess they are, just take all their stuff, immigrants can't to much about it or they get deported, or are too scared to do anything about it.

not doing their jobs very well...


	The   Armendariz   matter   should   have   been   considered   as   part   of   theevidence—indeed,  thebulkof  the  evidence—when  assessing  the  validity  of  the  CiscoPerez allegations.

	608.By  largely  disregarding  the  Armendariz  evidence  in  the  Cisco  Perezcriminal   investigation,   the   PSB   and   theassigned   criminal   investigator,   SergeantTennyson,  could  investigate  the  otherwise  largely  unsupported  Cisco  Perez  allegationswithout  taking  into  account  the  corroborating  physical  evidence  of  “pocketing”  that  theitems in Deputy Armendariz’s garage provided.


talking about an investigation by them. They investigated allegations of pocketing, but ignored a huge amount of evidence, for whatever reason...


how is this not illegal?


	On  November  20,  2014,  three  weeks  after  the  Courtheld  a  hearing  on  theAugust report, Sergeant Tennyson wrote a follow-up memorandum addressed directly toChief  Deputy  Sheridanthat  recommended  closing  anycriminal  investigation  as  itpertained  to  the  items  of  personal  propertyfound  in  Deputy  Armendariz’s  garage.    (Ex.1001.) 


decided to close investigation into the suspicious piles of evidence in the dead deputy's garage


goes on to say Sergeant Tennyson's investigation had "significant deficiencies"


pg 110

	This  also  demonstrates  that  HSU  leaders  were  quite  aware  of  the  ongoingArmendariz   investigation   and   one   of   its   topics   before   the   Cisco   Perez   criminalinvestigation even began.


hmmm


pg 111

Tennyson decides not to disclose perosnal property in Armendariz's garage that had obvious value and was traceable to victims.


pg 112


	...some of the property that Perez "pocketed" found its way to Armendariz's garage...


also parts saying a lot of pocketed stuff ending up in this guy's garage


	Sergeant Tennyson dropped any furtherinvestigations into the IDs once hedetermined  that  they  belonged  to  individuals  who  had  been  transferred  to  ICE.    (Ex.2025.)  He did so because he concluded thatit was impossible to locate persons who hadbeen  deported.   Tennyson  admitted  that  no  additional  efforts  were  made  to  locate  theseindividuals.  (Doc.1466 at Tr. 2942–44;see alsoEx. 2025.)  He further testified that he isnot aware of any such efforts made by the MCSO.  (SeeDoc. 1466 at Tr. 2893, 2904–05;Doc. 1467 at Tr. 3135–36;see alsoEx. 1001.)  These IDs were not fraudulent. Tennysonrelied on the identities providedby them in confirming, through MCSO records, that thepersons  identified  by  the  cards  were  transferred  to  immigration  authorities,  and  thenthrough  immigration  records  that  the  persons  were  ultimately  deported.    (See,  e.g.,  Ex.1001;see alsoEx. 2025; Ex. 2026.)  Further, based on their namesand their deportations,these persons are membersof the Plaintiff class. 


wait, the IDs weren't fraudulant, "persons identified by the cards were transferred to immigration authorities" and deported

so how did they get the IDs? where they even illegal immigrants at all? just deporting random Latino people?

could be Mexican ID I guess

sell to cartels in Mexico

pg 113

	648.In his November report, Sergeant Tennyson noted that Deputy Armendarizalleged,  just  prior  to  his  suicide  in  May,  that  a  female  detention  officer  coworker  in  theHSU removed items from HSU offices and placed them in Armendariz’s garage once she“got word of an upcoming inspection by the Internal Affairs Division.”  (Ex. 1001 at 3.)

	649.Sergeant   Tennyson’s   memorandum   dismissed   this   allegation   becauseTennyson  had  identified  and  interviewed  the  relevant  detention  officer,  RaphaelitaMontoya, and she “denied delivering anythingto the Armendariz residence.”  He furthernoted that Deputy Armendariz is a“pack rat.”


Sergeant Tennyson really dropping the ball here


then she admits she helped in load a bunch stuff maybe including IDs into his car


pg 120

	684.Even   though   Chief   Deputy   Sheridan   orderedthat   the   Cisco   Perezallegations  be  criminally  investigated,  hetestified  that  from  the  beginning  he  did  notthink that there was a basis to pursue a criminal investigation.  He did not believe that theword  of  a  mentally-ill  officer  (Deputy  Armendariz)  or  a  discredited  officer  (Perez)provided  any  probable  cause  to  investigate  HSU  members  for  pocketing  items.    (Doc.1389 at Tr. 1161–62, 1185–88;see alsoEx. 1001 at 3.)


hmm, maybe Perez wasn't a liar and Armendariz wasn't crazy after all. Which raises the question: how did he end up dead while waiting to be a major witness in the case that (almost) finally brought down Joe Arpaio?


pg 121

	As  a  result,  although  the  property  in  Deputy  Armendariz’s  garagewas  nottaken into considerationwhen determining the outcome ofthe criminal investigation intothe Cisco Perez allegations, that outcome wasused to determine thatno ‘further’ criminalinvestigation  into  the  property  found  in  the  Armendariz  garage  was  necessary.    Due  to  this  sleight-of-hand  circumvention,  the  PSB  never  conducted  a  criminal  investigation  toattempt to determine the source of the drugs, currency, weapons, credit cards, bank cards,or other property in Armendariz’shome.  (Doc. 1389 at Tr. 1171–72.) 

	The  Court  finds  that  Defendants  engaged  in  a  cursory  and  bad  faith investigation, and therefore IA #2014-295 is void.    


how is this not illegal


maybe botching an internal investigation isn't illegal

but the pocketing definitely is

	Thus, the investigators apparently had little concernabout whether the IDs,license  plates,  and  other  “trophies”  thatwere  scattered  around  MCSO  offices  wereappropriately  seized  in  the  first  place.   Theycontinued  to  accept  and  to  represent  to  theCourt that all of the IDs seized were fraudulent and used fortraining purposes, (see, e.g.,Doc. 803 at 49), or that they wereall seized by Deputy Armendariz.

	697.It  would  not  be  until  much  later,  as  IDs,  license  plates,and  other  propertykept  proliferating,  that  the  MCSO  would  finally  admit  that  it  had  a  pervasive  problem(not  limited  to  the  HSU)  with  department  deputies  taking  IDs,  license  plates,  and  otherproperty when they had no good reason to do so.  (Doc. 1043 at Tr. 992–93; Doc. 1417 atTr. 1546–47, 1554; Doc. 1505 atTr. 4023–24.) 


first say "we don't know how this got there" then admit there is a "problem" with taking IDs, license plates, and other property from random people and/or illegal immigrants


these guys sound incompetent

probably not KGB?

wonder if KGB did-in Armendariz


pg 126

	...Except for a Few Items, the MCSOLumped All of the Property Foundin Deputy Armendariz’sGarage into a Single“Umbrella” Investigationthat  Designated  (Deceased)  Deputy  Armendariz  as  the  Principal  andDelayed  Completion  of  that  Investigation  to  Avoid  Accountability  forIts Inadequate Execution. 


so they did an investigation, ignoring a separate investigation (Perez) into same kind of allegations, where everything would be blamed on Armendariz, who conveniently happened to be dead


pg 129

	The  Court  therefore  finds  that  the  completion  of  the  umbrella  Armendarizinvestigation (IA #2014-221) was manipulatedto avoid accountability in the evidentiaryhearings. 


"manipulated to avoid accountability in the evidentiary hearings"

woops!


pg 184

	There were systemic failures in the quality of supervision and discipline inthe Deputy Armendariz chainof command.  (Doc. 1467 at Tr. 3192–93.)  These failureswere  not  limited  to  the  HSU,but  extended  to  other  divisions  within  the  MCSO.    (Id.at3193–94.)  While some of these failures result directly from the orders of Sheriff Arpaio,and the structures of his administration, othersare attributable to a lack of training and alack of adequate staffing.  


It's Joe's fault

------


so from what I can tell is this is civil case I think? and judge found all sorts of abuse, ordered Arpaio to clean up, Apario agreed (I think?) on all except the racial profiling thing? perhaps knew he would be pardoned, or calculated better take the misdemeanor charge in exchange for protecting his image as "tough on immigration" guy


iirc order was for Arpaio to stop his "sweeps." But has also been said Arpaio did his sweeps because he thought it helped him in his elections. So he could have figured getting elected was more important than following the court order, and kept doing them anyway.

And sweeps had more aggrieved parties than just plaintiffs, as evident in mess they caused in Guadalupe, Mesa city. So a reasonable order that might have been ignored for selfish reasons, then Airpaio gets pardoned.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation-now/2017/07/31/joe-arpaio-verdict/526253001/
	Bolton’s ruling follows a five-day June and July trial, in which Department of Justice prosecutors argued that the 85-year-old had intentionally flouted a federal judge’s orders halting Arpaio’s signature immigration round-ups.

	In December 2011, amid a long-running racial profiling case, U.S. District Court Judge G. Murray Snow ordered Arpaio’s deputies to stop holding individuals solely on the belief they were in the country illegally. They only were to detain those who were accused of a state crime.

	But Arpaio’s deputies continued to do so for at least 17 months thereafter. During the bench trial, witnesses testified that 171 individuals were illegally apprehended and then turned over to U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement or to the Border Patrol.

	..."The evidence at trial proves beyond a reasonable doubt and the Court finds that Judge (G. Murray) Snow issued a clear and definite order enjoining Defendant from detaining persons for further investigation without reasonable suspicion that a crime has been or is being committed; that Defendant knew of the order; and that Defendant willfully violated the order by failing to do anything to ensure his subordinates’ compliance and by directing them to continue to detain persons for whom no criminal charges could be filed," Bolton wrote in the ruling. "Because the Court finds that Defendant willfully violated an order of the court, it finds Defendant guilty of criminal contempt."


ordered to stop December 2011, kept doing it during 17 months afterward, so during 2012 Sheriff election.


https://www.cbsnews.com/news/feds-ariz-sheriff-arpaio-violated-civil-rights/
	A review found that 20 percent of traffic reports handled by Arpaio's immigrant-smuggling squad from March 2006 to March 2009 were stops -- almost all involving Latino drivers -- that were done without reasonable suspicion. The stops rarely led to smuggling arrests.

	Latinos who were in the U.S. legally were arrested or detained without cause during the sweeps, according to the report.

	Illegal immigrants accounted for 57 percent of the 1,500 people arrested in the 20 sweeps conducted since January 2008, according to figures provided by Arpaio's office.


stops without reasonable suspicion, 43% legal citizens


------


http://www.cnn.com/2012/09/01/justice/arizona-arpaio/index.html
	Arpaio said that if he had done something wrong, the federal government wouldn't have hesitated to bring indictments.

	"I know my people do the right thing, they have a tough job, and because I'm a high-profile guy, sometimes there's more interest given to what we do," he said. 


------

https://www.justice.gov/crt/file/890346/download

pg 12

	When  Mr.  Casey  discussed  the  Plaintiffs’  allegations  with  Chief  Sands,Sands told Casey that the pressreleases describing the back-upplan were issued to assistSheriff Arpaio in his upcoming re-electioncampaign.  (Doc. 1417 at Tr. 1690:12–1691:5,1695:2–7; Doc. 1422 atTr. 1959:24–1961:2.) 


talking about Arpaio's "back up plan" to take immigration round-up people to border patrol instead of ICE. Cheif says it was issued to help Arpaio's re-election campaign.



pg 14

	Sheriff  Arpaio’s  Persistent  and  Publicized  Violations  of  the Preliminary Injunction Were Motivated by His Belief that  Such  Activities  Would  Benefit  His  Upcoming  Re-election Campaign. 


so that just flat out says it... ignored court because he wanted to get re-elected


------


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/local/valley/2015/04/20/judge-snow-faces-rare-decision-in-arpaio-case/26086431/
	"There is not a single thing about these proceedings that is ordinary or usual," he said. "Every single aspect of these proceedings from what the department of justice has attempted to do… to what Judge Snow through the ACLU has attempted to do, all of it is unusual. Typically… you would see the law enforcement agency attempt to compromise and work with the Department of Justice."


interesting


http://cdn.ca9.uscourts.gov/datastore/opinions/2015/04/15/13-16285.pdf


this talks about injunction, basically sounds like "stop detaining Latino people and holding them to confirm immigration status"

or stop racial profiling

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/true-crime/wp/2017/08/25/how-ex-sheriff-joe-arpaio-wound-up-facing-jail-time-before-trump-pardoned-him/
	After four years of depositions and hearings and motions, a federal judge in Phoenix entered a preliminary injunction against Arpaio and the sheriff’s office, noting that “states do not have the inherent authority to enforce the civil provisions of federal immigration law.” He ordered Arpaio to stop detaining anyone not suspected of a state or federal crime — simply being in the U.S. illegally is not a crime, only a civil violation.


interesting--saying injunction was actually to "stop detaining anyone no suspected of a state or federal crime", which means stop detaining people suspected of being in U.S. illegally, which is a civil violation.

Is kindof suspicious, would make more sense to instead order Arpaio to stop racial profiling?


does seem like case designed to be divisive


makes more sense to order Arpaio to do this given the particular way he enforced illegal immigration law

	In a preliminary injunction, Snow ordered Maricopa County to refrain from “detaining any person based only on knowledge or reasonable belief, without more, that the person is unlawfully present within the United States.” In May 2013, after further hearings, Snow made that injunction permanent.


so basically, can't detain based on suspicion of being illegal immigrant alone


this actually makes sense--when they were doing that, they ended up with 43% of the people they detained being citizens, so detained for no reason. Would make more sense to investigate and bring to trial, not detain. The very problem such an injunction would prevent was endemic under Arpaio.

	But Snow noted that Arpaio was issuing defiant press releases, including one which said, “Regardless of the Obama Administration’s policy, I am going to continue to enforce all of the illegal immigration laws” despite the injunctions prohibiting him from doing so.


this true? seems like you can still enforce immigration law without detaining on suspicion alone. Just don't detain until convicted.

Although that does make it more difficult...

which is worse: being guilty of evading arrest, or being deported?

	...The judge took the extremely rare step of referring the case to another judge for criminal contempt prosecution. “If the sheriff had evidenced a genuine desire to comply with the orders of this court,” Snow wrote in August 2016, “it would be a different matter. The court has exhausted all of its other methods to obtain compliance.”

	Because prosecutors elected to seek only a six-month maximum sentence, the trial did not automatically require a jury. This outraged Arpaio and his supporters. “It’s like trying a criminal case to the victim,” Wilenchik said, because the federal court was both charging and hearing the case, though with a different judge. Wilenchik asked the Supreme Court to rule on the issue before trial, but it did not.


that's weird. Why do that?


------


so what is debate here?


Arpaio clearly broke law, clearly deserves to go to jail.


Injunction that makes it hard or impossible to enforce immigration law generally a bad idea.


The way Arpaio was enforcing immigration law was disastrous, and injunction would have put a stop to it if followed.


Trump pardons citing Arpaio's "extraordinary service," says charged for "doing his job."


One question: what else was Arpaio pardoned for? 

------

https://www.apnews.com/f6ee1cbd6fb94929b69353a681cefca6/A-look-at-the-president's-pardon-power-and-how-it-works?utm_campaign=SocialFlow&utm_source=Twitter&utm_medium=AP_Politics
	His pardoning also took place before he was sentenced. Arpaio was convicted July 31 of misdemeanor contempt of court for intentionally defying a 2011 court order to stop traffic patrols that targeted immigrants.


was it really about traffic patrols? other said it was about detaining people suspected of being illegal immigrants in general

	...One of Arpaio’s attorneys, Jack Wilenchik, said in a telephone interview Saturday that next week Arpaio’s attorneys will file a motion to vacate his conviction and to dismiss the case with prejudice, “meaning forever.” ″This is the end,” he said. Wilenchik said of the pardon the “president has done the right thing here.”


so sounds like it applies just to the criminal case that Bolton was looking at?


http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/local/phoenix/2017/07/31/maricopa-county-sheriff-joe-arpaio-found-guilty-criminal-contempt-court/486278001/
	“Credible testimony shows that the Defendant knew of the order and what the order meant in regards to the MCSO’s policy of detaining persons who did not have state charges for turnover to ICE for civil immigration violations,” the ruling read.


sounds familiar

iirc there was a policy where they could detain someone if they were also suspected of another crime, but not if they were suspected solely of being an illegal immigrant

	The verdict is a rejection of Arpaio’s defense: That the order was unclear and that, although mistakes had been made, the violations were unintended. Willful intent is required to prove criminal contempt rather than civil contempt.


And Arpaio's defense is sketchy, wily. Not anything principled like "I believe this injunction hurts the security of Maricopa county." (wich wouldn't work so well anyway since Arpaio's conduct hurt security of AMricop county in the first place)


shows defiance in public, in court tries all sorts of tricks


injunction at end

	on December 23, 2011, Judge Snow issued an order granting in part and denying in part their motions for summary judgment. ...


		MCSO and all of its officers are hereby enjoined from detaining any person based only on knowledge or reasonable belief, without more, that the person is unlawfully present within the United States


so can't detain solely on knowledge or "reasonable belief" that person is unlawfully present in U.S.

this is preliminary injunction


pg 7 of that doc:

	On May 24, 2013, Judge Snow issued a permanent injunction enjoining the MCSO from “[d]etaining, holding, or arresting Latino occupants of vehicles in Maricopa Country based on a reasonable belief, without more, that such persons were in the country without authorization” among other things.


this is permanent injunction


another part of the injunction:


	Amendment, Judge Snow said “[l]ocal law enforcement officers may therefore not detainvehicle passengers based upon probable cause, or even actual knowledge, without more,that those passengers are not lawfully in the United States, since such knowledge doesnot provide officers with reasonable suspicion that the passengers are violating any lawthat local law enforcement can enforce.” (Gov’t Ex. 1 at 12-13.) He further said, “[l]ocallaw enforcement agencies, such as the MCSO, may not enforce civil immigration law.Defendants are therefore enjoined from detaining individuals in order to investigate civilviolations of federal immigration law.” (Gov’t Ex. 1 at 39.)


absolutely no reason to add this. Murder is a federal law, can local law enforcement not enforce that? wtf is he talking about?

all he had to say was "don't detain people solely on suspicion of being an illegal immigrant." That's it.

very suspicious

or is he basically saying this is ICE's job, not Arpaio's?


https://www.ice.gov/287g
	U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) is responsible for enforcing federal immigration laws as part of its homeland security mission. ICE works closely with federal, state and local law enforcement partners in this mission. The 287(g) program, one of ICE's top partnership initiatives, allows a state or local law enforcement entity to enter into a partnership with ICE, under a joint Memorandum of Agreement (MOA), in order to receive delegated authority for immigration enforcement within their jurisdictions.


right this makes sense

it's ICE's job to detain illegal immigrants, and 287(g) lets them share that responsibility with local law enforcement.

But Airpao's 287(g) authority was revoked

http://azcapitoltimes.com/news/2012/06/25/homeland-security-revokes-287g-immigration-check-agreements-in-arizona/
	DHS in December revoked the Maricopa County Sheriff’s Office’s 287(g) task force agreement in response to allegations from the U.S. Department of Justice that the agency and Sheriff Joe Arpaio engaged in widespread racial profiling and civil rights violations against Latinos.

revoked for Maricopa counter in December 2011, for good reason

ICE part of DHS

------

http://www.foxnews.com/opinion/2017/08/26/trumps-pardon-ex-sheriff-joe-arpaio-was-right-and-courageous-thing-to-do.html
	...I sat in the courtroom through Arpaio’s trial and concluded that he was wrongfully convicted.

	...The author leads The National Center for Police Defense (NCPD) a non-profit dedicated to helping law enforcement officers who have been charged with a crime while following, “to the best of their ability,” the training and knowledge that they have been taught to use, by their departments. His charity supported former Sheriff Joe Arpaio's legal defense.

------


https://www.americanbar.org/publications/insights_on_law_andsociety/14/winter-2014/understanding-injunctions.html
	Preliminary injunction—These types of injunctions are generally meant to preserve a status quo of action or inaction, pending a final decision of a case. Unlike temporary restraining orders, preliminary injunctions cannot be issued without advanced notice to the other party in the case. Preliminary injunctions remain in effect, unless otherwise modified or dissolved, during the pending court case. Preliminary injunctions are common in court-related media reports. For example, New York Yankees baseball player Alex Rodriguez recently petitioned a federal court for a preliminary injunction to stop his suspension from going into effect, pending litigation.

	Permanent Injunction—These types of injunctions are meant to pre­serve a status of action or inaction per­manently. They are generally issued as final judgments, or rulings, in a case. In some cases, the conditions estab­lished by the preliminary injunctions are continued as permanent arrange­ments. Permanent injunctions are less commonly mentioned in the media. One example appeared in 2013, when Apple asked a federal court for a permanent injunction against Samsung to prevent the sales of certain Samsung products found to infringe upon Apple’s copy­rights. If granted, Samsung would be permanently prohibited from selling those products.


------

https://www.ice.gov/287g#wcm-survey-target-id
	The Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996 added Section 287(g), performance of immigration officer functions by state officers and employees, to the Immigration and Nationality Act. This authorizes the Director of ICE to enter into agreements with state and local law enforcement agencies, permitting designated officers to perform immigration law enforcement functions, provided that the local law enforcement officers receive appropriate training and function under the supervision of ICE officers.


ICE's job to enforce immigration law. Basically a privilege they can give to local law enforcement, conditional.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Immigration_and_Nationality_Act_Section_287%28g%29
	The US Justice Department has found that some localities participating in the 287(g) program have used their authority to commit large scale pattern or practice constitutional violations. For example, Maricopa, Arizona Sheriff Joe Arpaio used his authority under § 287(g) to justify sweeps during which Latinos were illegally racially profiled.[10][11] Muzaffar Chishti of the Migration Policy Institute described the situation there by saying, "there were people in yellow suits running around catching Hispanics."[4] In Alamance County, NC, sheriff’s deputies established checkpoints at entrances to Latino neighborhoods where Latino drivers were ten times more likely to be stopped than non-Latino drivers. It was also found that for the same traffic violations, Latino drivers were frequently arrested, whereas non-Latino drivers merely received citations.[12] In February 2017, the ACLU cited numerous instances of civil rights violations, patterns of racial discrimination, and patterns of improper behavior among § 287(g) participating localities, and urged ICE to discontinue the program on the grounds that these localities could not be trusted to attend to constitutional and civil rights.


and credible allegations they were abusing this privilege

------

http://www.azfamily.com/story/17205138/dream-act-protesters-released-from-ice
	ICE releases 4 DREAM Act protesters
	Posted: Mar 21, 2012 12:17 AM UTC 

	PHOENIX (CBS5/AP) - Four undocumented students who were arrested while protesting Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio's immigration policies have been released from Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

	"Upon further review, ICE has determined that these individuals do not fall under ICE's enforcement priorities, and the agency has lifted the previously lodged detainees," said ICE spokeswoman Amber Cargile on Wednesday night.


ICE more lenient than Arpaio would have been


http://www.azfamily.com/story/16374824/arpaio-ice-refusing-to-take-detainees
	Arpaio: ICE refuses to take illegal immigrants from MCSO

	...MCSO says they asked if the new policy only applies to MCSO and were told "Yes."

	MCSO says they then contacted Casa Grande Border Patrol who picked up the illegal immigrants.


sounds like instead Arpaio going political, trying to say ICE not doing their job?

but the whole point is ICE does their job better than Arpaio does

http://articles.latimes.com/2012/dec/22/local/la-me-1222-immigration-detention-20121222
	ICE excludes minor offenses from deportation program

	Illegal immigrants who are arrested in minor crimes will no longer be targeted for deportation, the Obama administration announced Friday in an apparent concession to the increasing number of jurisdictions pushing back against its Secure Communities program.


Obama making everything worse


http://www.tucsonsentinel.com/local/report/040212_az_criminal_sweep/34-arrested-az-ice-sweep-criminals/
	Raids by Immigration and Customs Enforcement and other agencies over the last week led to the arrest of more than 3,100 immigrants, including:

	68 arrested in Arizona, including 58 in Phoenix, six in Tucson

	2,834 criminals arrested nationally, including 1,477 with felony convictions, 50 gang members and 149 convicted sex offenders

	559 arrested who had been ordered to leave but remained in the U.S.


ICE doing their job better than Arpaio


-----


so basically what happened:

Arpaio, in addition to being horribly corrupt, racially profiles, detains innocent people solely on suspicion of being an illegal immigrant, takes their stuff. Immigration raids mess with towns, mayor in tears. Detains a Mexican tourist.

Abuses 287(g)

DOJ calls him out, DHS revokes 287(g), preliminary injunction basically says "you can't enforce immigration law."

Arpaio ignores, openly defies

Arpaio also does a bunch of half-assed investigations, cover-ups, destroying evidence, a bunch ends up in garage of suspiciously dead deputy

Arpaio gets hit with criminal contempt

Trump pardons


------

http://abcnews.go.com/US/sheriff-joe-arpaios-biggest-publicity-stunts/story?id=15833775

Arpaio's biggest publicity stunts


------

https://www.justice.gov/iso/opa/resources/46420125101544060757.pdf

complaint of abuse


http://americasvoice.org/research/the_notorious_record_of_maricopa_county_azs_sheriff_joe_arpaio/


summary of some abuses by Arpaio


section on innefective tactics


------

http://www.azcentral.com/story/news/arizona/investigations/2015/09/11/sheriff-joe-arpaio-legacy/71888720/


on Apraio's image, political savvy


	In April 2005, an Army reservist named Patrick Haab pulled a gun on five men he thought were illegal immigrants at a rest stop on Interstate 8. He made them lie down on the ground, and he called police.

	Arpaio had Haab arrested.

	“Even law enforcement has to have probable cause before taking people out of their cars and telling them to lie on the ground. ... He threatened to kill them,” Arpaio told the media at the time. “He did not have the right to do what he did. How did he know they were illegal aliens?”


interesting


goes into detail on retlaiation on Downing

	Even Arpaio’s biographer, Len Sherman, wonders if reckoning day is coming for Arpaio.

	“You reap what you sow,” Sherman said. “If you’re going to do things the way you want, you might pay the consequences.”

	Sherman didn’t think that would happen when he wrote the preface of Arpaio’s second book, Joe’s Law.

	“We quickly tire of our heroes, probably because they’re not really heroes at all. They appear, they glitter, they are everywhere, and then we learn the truth that they are nothing but false fronts ... (T)hey’re all part of the same media world we inhabit — and they’ve all disappointed us so many times that poll after poll demonstrates that we no longer trust any of our leading institutions.

	“And so to Joe Arpaio.”


------


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/06/off-message-transcript-joe-arpaio-224519


sort-of soft interview with Glenn Thrush, the Russian propagandist
